Illinois, session 104th, SB2114.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Enterprise Zone Act is amended by 5changing Section 5.2.1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 655/5.2.1)7    Sec. 5.2.1. Enterprise Zone Board. 8    (a) An Enterprise Zone Board is hereby created within the 9Department. 10    (b) The Board shall consist of the following 5 members: 11        (1) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 12    or his or her designee, who shall serve as chairperson; 13        (2) the Director of Revenue, or his or her designee; 14    and 15        (3) three members appointed by the Governor, with the 16    advice and consent of the Senate. 17    Board members shall serve without compensation but may be 18reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance 19of their duties. 20    (c) Each member appointed under item (3) of subsection (b) 21shall have at least 5 years of experience in business, 22economic development, or site location. Of the members 23appointed under item (3) of subsection (b): one member shall   SB2114- 2 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1reside in Cook County; one member shall reside in DuPage, 2Kane, Lake, McHenry, or Will County; and one member shall 3reside in a county other than Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, 4McHenry, or Will.5    (d) Of the initial members appointed under item (3) of 6subsection (b): one member shall serve for a term of 2 years; 7one member shall serve for a term of 3 years; and one member 8shall serve for a term of 4 years. Thereafter, all members 9appointed under item (3) of subsection (b) shall serve for 10terms of 4 years. Members appointed under item (3) of 11subsection (b) may be reappointed. The Governor may remove a 12member appointed under item (3) of subsection (b) for 13incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office. 14    (e) By September 30, 2015, and September 30 of each year 15thereafter, all applications filed by December 31 of the 16preceding calendar year and deemed qualified by the Department 17shall be approved or denied by the Board. If such application 18is not approved by September 30, the application shall be 19considered denied. If an application is denied, the Board 20shall inform the applicant of the specific reasons for the 21denial. 22    (f) A majority of the Board will determine whether an 23application is approved or denied. The Board is not, at any 24time, required to designate an enterprise zone. 25    (g) In determining which designated areas shall be 26approved and certified as enterprise zones, the Board shall   SB2114- 3 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1give preference to the extent to which the area meets the 2criteria set forth in Section 4. 3(Source: P.A. 97-905, eff. 8-7-12; 98-109, eff. 7-25-13.) 4    Section 10. The Energy Transition Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-65 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 730/5-65)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)8    Sec. 5-65. Energy Workforce Advisory Council. 9    (a) The Energy Workforce Advisory Council is hereby 10created within the Department.11    (b) The Council shall consist of the following voting 12members appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent 13of the Senate, chosen to ensure diverse geographic 14representation:15        (1) two members representing trade associations 16    representing companies active in the clean energy 17    industries;18        (2) two members representing a labor union;19        (3) one member who has participated in the workforce 20    development programs created under this Act;21        (4) two members representing higher education;22        (5) two members representing economic development 23    organizations;24        (6) two members representing local workforce   SB2114- 4 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    innovation boards;2        (7) two residents of environmental justice 3    communities;4        (8) three members from community-based organizations 5    in environmental justice communities and community-based 6    organizations serving low-income persons and families;7        (9) two members who are policy or implementation 8    experts on small business development, contractor 9    incubation, or small business lending and financing needs;10        (10) two members who are policy or implementation 11    experts on workforce development for populations and 12    individuals such as low-income persons and families, 13    environmental justice communities, BIPOC communities, 14    formerly convicted persons, persons who are or were in the 15    child welfare system, energy workers, gender nonconforming 16    and transgender individuals, and youth; and17        (11) two representatives of clean energy businesses, 18    nonprofit organizations, or other groups that provide 19    clean energy.20    The President of the Senate, the Minority Leader of the 21Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the 22Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each 23appoint 2 nonvoting members of the Council. 24    (c) The Council shall:25        (1) coordinate and inform on worker and contractor 26    support priorities beyond current federal, State, local,   SB2114- 5 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    and private programs and resources;2        (2) advise and produce recommendations for further 3    federal, State, and local programs and activities;4        (3) fulfill other duties determined by the Council to 5    further the success of the Workforce Hubs, Incubators, and 6    Returning Residents Programs;7        (4) review program performance metrics; 8        (5) provide recommendations to the Department on the 9    administration of the following programs:10            (i) the Clean Jobs Workforce Network Program;11            (ii) the Illinois Climate Works Preapprenticeship 12        Program;13            (iii) the Clean Energy Contractor Incubator 14        Program;15            (iv) the Returning Residents Clean Jobs Training 16        Program; and17            (v) the Clean Energy Primes Contractor Accelerator 18        Program;19        (6) recommend outreach opportunities to ensure that 20    program contracting, training, and other opportunities are 21    widely publicized;22        (7) participate in independent program evaluations; 23    and24        (8) assist the Department by providing insight into 25    how relevant State, local, and federal programs are viewed 26    by residents, businesses, and institutions within their   SB2114- 6 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    respective communities.2    (d) The Council shall conduct its first meeting within 30 3days after all members have been appointed. The Council shall 4meet quarterly after its first meeting. Additional hearings 5and public meetings are permitted at the discretion of the 6members. The Council may meet in person or through video or 7audio conference. Meeting times may be varied to accommodate 8Council member schedules.9    (e) Members shall serve without compensation and shall be 10reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance 11of their duties from funds appropriated for that purpose.12(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 13    Section 15. The Energy Community Reinvestment Act is 14amended by changing Section 10-15 as follows: 15    (20 ILCS 735/10-15)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)17    Sec. 10-15. Energy Transition Workforce Commission. 18    (a) The Energy Transition Workforce Commission is hereby 19created within the Department of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity. 21    (b) The Commission shall consist of the following members: 22        (1) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity; 23        (2) the Director of Labor, or his or her designee, who 24    shall serve as chairperson;  SB2114- 7 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (3) 5 members appointed by the Governor, with the 2    advice and consent of the Senate, of which at least one 3    shall be a representative of a local labor organization, 4    at least one shall be a resident of an environmental 5    justice community, at least one shall be a representative 6    of a national labor organization, and at least one shall 7    be a representative of the administrator of workforce 8    training programs created by this Act. Designees shall be 9    appointed within 60 days after a vacancy; and10        (4) the 3 Regional Administrators selected under 11    Section 5-15 of the Energy Transition Act.12    (c) Members of the Commission shall serve without 13compensation, but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses 14incurred in the performance of their duties from funds 15appropriated for that purpose. The Department of Commerce and 16Economic Opportunity shall provide administrative support to 17the Commission. 18    (d) Within 240 days after the effective date of this Act, 19and in consultation with the Department of Revenue and the 20Environmental Protection Agency, the Commission shall produce 21an Energy Transition Workforce Report regarding the 22anticipated impact of the energy transition and a 23comprehensive set of recommendations to address changes to the 24Illinois workforce during the period of 2020 through 2050, or 25a later year. The report shall contain the following elements, 26designed to be used for the programs created in this Act:   SB2114- 8 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (1) Information related to the impact on current 2    workers, including: 3            (A) a comprehensive accounting of all employees 4        who currently work in fossil fuel energy generation, 5        nuclear energy generation, and coal mining in the 6        State; upon receipt of the employee's written 7        authorization for the employer's release of such 8        information to the Commission, this shall include 9        information on their location, employer, salary 10        ranges, full-time or part-time status, nature of their 11        work, educational attainment, union status, and other 12        factors the Commission finds relevant;13            (B) the anticipated schedule of closures of fossil 14        fuel power plants, nuclear power plants, and coal 15        mines across the State; when information is 16        unavailable to provide exact data, the report shall 17        include approximations based upon the best available 18        information; and19            (C) an estimate of worker impacts due to scheduled 20        closures, including layoffs, early retirements, salary 21        changes, and other factors the Commission finds 22        relevant. 23        (2) Information regarding impact on communities and 24    local governments, including: 25            (A) changes in the revenue for units of local 26        government in areas that currently or recently have   SB2114- 9 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        had a closure or reduction in operation of a fossil 2        fuel power plant, nuclear power plant, coal mine, or 3        related industry; 4            (B) environmental impacts in areas that currently 5        or recently have had fossil fuel power plants, coal 6        mines, nuclear power plants, or related industry; and 7            (C) economic impacts of the energy transition, 8        including, but not limited to, the supply chain 9        impacts of the energy transition shift toward new 10        energy sources across the State. 11        (3) Information on emerging industries and State 12    economic development opportunities in regions that have 13    historically been the site of fossil fuel power plants, 14    nuclear power plants, or coal mining. 15    (e) The Department shall periodically review its findings 16in the developed reports and make modifications to the report 17and programs based on new findings. The Department shall 18conduct a comprehensive reevaluation of the report, and 19publish a modified version, on each of the following years 20following initial publication: 2023; 2027; 2030; 2035; 2040; 21and any year thereafter which the Department determines is 22necessary or prudent. 23(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 24    Section 20. The Department of Natural Resources Act is 25amended by changing Section 20-10 as follows:   SB2114- 10 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    (20 ILCS 801/20-10)2    Sec. 20-10. Advisory Board of the Illinois State Museum. 3    (a) Within the Department there shall be an Advisory Board 4of the Illinois State Museum. The Advisory Board shall be 5composed of 11 persons who shall be appointed by the Governor 6with the advice and consent of the Senate. Any members 7appointed before July 1, 2026 shall serve the full term for 8which they were appointed, unless removed by the Governor. 9Beginning on July 1, 2026, 9 members shall have at least 5 10years of experience practicing or teaching in natural 11sciences, anthropology, art, history, or business and shall be 12from diverse backgrounds and geographical locations across the 13State; and 2 members shall be representatives of 14community-based organizations, irrespective of background and 15experience. Beginning on July 1, 2026, the Board shall include 166 individuals from a historically marginalized identity. All 17members appointed after January 1, 2025 shall serve for 2-year 18terms. The Governor shall be entitled to remove any member due 19to incompetency, dereliction of duty, or malfeasance. 20    The transfer of the Board to the Department under this Act 21does not terminate or otherwise affect the term of membership 22of any member of the Board, except that the former Director of 23Energy and Natural Resources is replaced by the Director of 24Natural Resources.25    (b) The Advisory Board shall:  SB2114- 11 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (1) advise the Director of the Department, or the 2    Director's designee, in all matters pertaining to the 3    maintenance, the extension, and the mission of the State 4    Museum, including, but not limited to, the needs for 5    capital development projects, assistance with long-term 6    planning for the State Museum, and other large-scale 7    operational changes, except that these matters shall be 8    determined and shall be defined solely by the State 9    Museum;10        (2) make recommendations concerning the appointment of 11    a new State Museum director whenever a vacancy occurs in 12    that position, except that the Department shall have the 13    sole authority to determine the process used to identify 14    and employ a new State Museum director, including, but not 15    limited to, the authority to determine how and when to 16    involve or employ an individual or business to aid in 17    conducting a search for interested and qualified 18    candidates; to identify qualified candidates; to interview 19    candidates; to make an offer of employment to the selected 20    candidate; and to determine the compensation of the new 21    State Museum Director; 22        (3) (blank); and 23        (4) review the budget of the Illinois State Museum and 24    make recommendations to the Director of the Department.25    (c) (Blank).26(Source: P.A. 102-303, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1005, eff. 5-27-22;   SB2114- 12 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1103-835, eff. 8-9-24.) 2    Section 25. The Department of Human Services Act is 3amended by changing Section 1-17 as follows: 4    (20 ILCS 1305/1-17)5    Sec. 1-17. Inspector General.6    (a) Nature and purpose. It is the express intent of the 7General Assembly to ensure the health, safety, and financial 8condition of individuals receiving services in this State due 9to mental illness, developmental disability, or both by 10protecting those persons from acts of abuse, neglect, or both 11by service providers. To that end, the Office of the Inspector 12General for the Department of Human Services is created to 13investigate and report upon allegations of the abuse, neglect, 14or financial exploitation of individuals receiving services 15within mental health facilities, developmental disabilities 16facilities, and community agencies operated, licensed, funded, 17or certified by the Department of Human Services, but not 18licensed or certified by any other State agency.19    (b) Definitions. The following definitions apply to this 20Section:21    "Agency" or "community agency" means (i) a community 22agency licensed, funded, or certified by the Department, but 23not licensed or certified by any other human services agency 24of the State, to provide mental health service or   SB2114- 13 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1developmental disabilities service, or (ii) a program 2licensed, funded, or certified by the Department, but not 3licensed or certified by any other human services agency of 4the State, to provide mental health service or developmental 5disabilities service.6    "Aggravating circumstance" means a factor that is 7attendant to a finding and that tends to compound or increase 8the culpability of the accused.9    "Allegation" means an assertion, complaint, suspicion, or 10incident involving any of the following conduct by an 11employee, facility, or agency against an individual or 12individuals: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, 13neglect, financial exploitation, or material obstruction of an 14investigation.15    "Day" means working day, unless otherwise specified.16    "Deflection" means a situation in which an individual is 17presented for admission to a facility or agency, and the 18facility staff or agency staff do not admit the individual. 19"Deflection" includes triage, redirection, and denial of 20admission.21    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 22    "Developmental disability" means "developmental 23disability" as defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 24Disabilities Code.25    "Egregious neglect" means a finding of neglect as 26determined by the Inspector General that (i) represents a   SB2114- 14 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1gross failure to adequately provide for, or a callused 2indifference to, the health, safety, or medical needs of an 3individual and (ii) results in an individual's death or other 4serious deterioration of an individual's physical condition or 5mental condition.6    "Employee" means any person who provides services at the 7facility or agency on-site or off-site. The service 8relationship can be with the individual or with the facility 9or agency. Also, "employee" includes any employee or 10contractual agent of the Department of Human Services or the 11community agency involved in providing or monitoring or 12administering mental health or developmental disability 13services. This includes but is not limited to: owners, 14operators, payroll personnel, contractors, subcontractors, and 15volunteers.16    "Facility" or "State-operated facility" means a mental 17health facility or developmental disabilities facility 18operated by the Department.19    "Financial exploitation" means taking unjust advantage of 20an individual's assets, property, or financial resources 21through deception, intimidation, or conversion for the 22employee's, facility's, or agency's own advantage or benefit.23    "Finding" means the Office of Inspector General's 24determination regarding whether an allegation is 25substantiated, unsubstantiated, or unfounded.26    "Health Care Worker Registry" or "Registry" means the   SB2114- 15 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Health Care Worker Registry under the Health Care Worker 2Background Check Act.3    "Individual" means any person receiving mental health 4service, developmental disabilities service, or both from a 5facility or agency, while either on-site or off-site.6    "Material obstruction of an investigation" means the 7purposeful interference with an investigation of physical 8abuse, sexual abuse, mental abuse, neglect, or financial 9exploitation and includes, but is not limited to, the 10withholding or altering of documentation or recorded evidence; 11influencing, threatening, or impeding witness testimony; 12presenting untruthful information during an interview; failing 13to cooperate with an investigation conducted by the Office of 14the Inspector General. If an employee, following a criminal 15investigation of physical abuse, sexual abuse, mental abuse, 16neglect, or financial exploitation, is convicted of an offense 17that is factually predicated on the employee presenting 18untruthful information during the course of the investigation, 19that offense constitutes obstruction of an investigation. 20Obstruction of an investigation does not include: an 21employee's lawful exercising of his or her constitutional 22right against self-incrimination, an employee invoking his or 23her lawful rights to union representation as provided by a 24collective bargaining agreement or the Illinois Public Labor 25Relations Act, or a union representative's lawful activities 26providing representation under a collective bargaining   SB2114- 16 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1agreement or the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 2Obstruction of an investigation is considered material when it 3could significantly impair an investigator's ability to gather 4all relevant facts. An employee shall not be placed on the 5Health Care Worker Registry for presenting untruthful 6information during an interview conducted by the Office of the 7Inspector General, unless, prior to the interview, the 8employee was provided with any previous signed statements he 9or she made during the course of the investigation. 10    "Mental abuse" means the use of demeaning, intimidating, 11or threatening words, signs, gestures, or other actions by an 12employee about an individual and in the presence of an 13individual or individuals that results in emotional distress 14or maladaptive behavior, or could have resulted in emotional 15distress or maladaptive behavior, for any individual present.16    "Mental illness" means "mental illness" as defined in the 17Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code.18    "Mentally ill" means having a mental illness. 19    "Mitigating circumstance" means a condition that (i) is 20attendant to a finding, (ii) does not excuse or justify the 21conduct in question, but (iii) may be considered in evaluating 22the severity of the conduct, the culpability of the accused, 23or both the severity of the conduct and the culpability of the 24accused.25    "Neglect" means an employee's, agency's, or facility's 26failure to provide adequate medical care, personal care, or   SB2114- 17 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1maintenance and that, as a consequence, (i) causes an 2individual pain, injury, or emotional distress, (ii) results 3in either an individual's maladaptive behavior or the 4deterioration of an individual's physical condition or mental 5condition, or (iii) places the individual's health or safety 6at substantial risk.7    "Person with a developmental disability" means a person 8having a developmental disability.9    "Physical abuse" means an employee's non-accidental and 10inappropriate contact with an individual that causes bodily 11harm. "Physical abuse" includes actions that cause bodily harm 12as a result of an employee directing an individual or person to 13physically abuse another individual.14    "Presenting untruthful information" means making a false 15statement, material to an investigation of physical abuse, 16sexual abuse, mental abuse, neglect, or financial 17exploitation, knowing the statement is false. 18    "Recommendation" means an admonition, separate from a 19finding, that requires action by the facility, agency, or 20Department to correct a systemic issue, problem, or deficiency 21identified during an investigation. "Recommendation" can also 22mean an admonition to correct a systemic issue, problem or 23deficiency during a review. 24    "Required reporter" means any employee who suspects, 25witnesses, or is informed of an allegation of any one or more 26of the following: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse,   SB2114- 18 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1neglect, or financial exploitation.2    "Secretary" means the Chief Administrative Officer of the 3Department.4    "Sexual abuse" means any sexual contact or intimate 5physical contact between an employee and an individual, 6including an employee's coercion or encouragement of an 7individual to engage in sexual behavior that results in sexual 8contact, intimate physical contact, sexual behavior, or 9intimate physical behavior. Sexual abuse also includes (i) an 10employee's actions that result in the sending or showing of 11sexually explicit images to an individual via computer, 12cellular phone, electronic mail, portable electronic device, 13or other media with or without contact with the individual or 14(ii) an employee's posting of sexually explicit images of an 15individual online or elsewhere whether or not there is contact 16with the individual.17    "Sexually explicit images" includes, but is not limited 18to, any material which depicts nudity, sexual conduct, or 19sado-masochistic abuse, or which contains explicit and 20detailed verbal descriptions or narrative accounts of sexual 21excitement, sexual conduct, or sado-masochistic abuse.22    "Substantiated" means there is a preponderance of the 23evidence to support the allegation.24    "Unfounded" means there is no credible evidence to support 25the allegation.26    "Unsubstantiated" means there is credible evidence, but   SB2114- 19 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1less than a preponderance of evidence to support the 2allegation. 3    (c) Appointment. The Governor shall appoint, and the 4Senate shall confirm, an Inspector General. The Inspector 5General shall be appointed for a term of 4 years and shall 6function within the Department of Human Services and report to 7the Secretary and the Governor. 8    (d) Operation and appropriation. The Inspector General 9shall function independently within the Department with 10respect to the operations of the Office, including the 11performance of investigations and issuance of findings and 12recommendations and the performance of site visits and reviews 13of facilities and community agencies. The appropriation for 14the Office of Inspector General shall be separate from the 15overall appropriation for the Department.16    (e) Powers and duties. The Inspector General shall 17investigate reports of suspected mental abuse, physical abuse, 18sexual abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 19individuals in any mental health or developmental disabilities 20facility or agency and shall have authority to take immediate 21action to prevent any one or more of the following from 22happening to individuals under its jurisdiction: mental abuse, 23physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, or financial 24exploitation. The Inspector General shall also investigate 25allegations of material obstruction of an investigation by an 26employee. Upon written request of an agency of this State, the   SB2114- 20 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Inspector General may assist another agency of the State in 2investigating reports of the abuse, neglect, or abuse and 3neglect of persons with mental illness, persons with 4developmental disabilities, or persons with both. The 5Inspector General shall conduct annual site visits of each 6facility and may conduct reviews of facilities and community 7agencies. To comply with the requirements of subsection (k) of 8this Section, the Inspector General shall also review all 9reportable deaths for which there is no allegation of abuse or 10neglect. Nothing in this Section shall preempt any duties of 11the Medical Review Board set forth in the Mental Health and 12Developmental Disabilities Code. The Inspector General shall 13have no authority to investigate alleged violations of the 14State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. Allegations of 15misconduct under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act 16shall be referred to the Office of the Governor's Executive 17Inspector General for investigation.18    (f) Limitations. The Inspector General shall not conduct 19an investigation within an agency or facility if that 20investigation would be redundant to or interfere with an 21investigation conducted by another State agency. The Inspector 22General shall have no supervision over, or involvement in, the 23routine programmatic, licensing, funding, or certification 24operations of the Department. Nothing in this subsection 25limits investigations by the Department that may otherwise be 26required by law or that may be necessary in the Department's   SB2114- 21 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1capacity as central administrative authority responsible for 2the operation of the State's mental health and developmental 3disabilities facilities.4    (g) Rulemaking authority. The Inspector General shall 5promulgate rules establishing minimum requirements for 6reporting allegations as well as for initiating, conducting, 7and completing investigations based upon the nature of the 8allegation or allegations. The rules shall clearly establish 9that if 2 or more State agencies could investigate an 10allegation, the Inspector General shall not conduct an 11investigation that would be redundant to, or interfere with, 12an investigation conducted by another State agency. The rules 13shall further clarify the method and circumstances under which 14the Office of Inspector General may interact with the 15licensing, funding, or certification units of the Department 16in preventing further occurrences of mental abuse, physical 17abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, egregious neglect, financial 18exploitation, and material obstruction of an investigation.19    (g-5) Site visits and review authority.20        (1) Site visits. The Inspector General shall conduct 21    unannounced site visits to each facility at least annually 22    for the purpose of reviewing and making recommendations on 23    systemic issues relative to preventing, reporting, 24    investigating, and responding to all of the following: 25    mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, 26    egregious neglect, financial exploitation, or material   SB2114- 22 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    obstruction of an investigation.2        (2) Review authority. In response to complaints or 3    information gathered from investigations, the Inspector 4    General shall have and may exercise the authority to 5    initiate reviews of facilities and agencies related to 6    preventing, reporting, investigating, and responding to 7    all of the following: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual 8    abuse, neglect, egregious neglect, financial exploitation, 9    or material obstruction of an investigation. Upon 10    concluding a review, the Inspector General shall issue a 11    written report setting forth its conclusions and 12    recommendations. The report shall be distributed to the 13    Secretary and to the director of the facility or agency 14    that was the subject of review. Within 45 calendar days, 15    the facility or agency shall submit a written response 16    addressing the Inspector General's conclusions and 17    recommendations and, in a concise and reasoned manner, the 18    actions taken, if applicable, to: (i) protect the 19    individual or individuals; (ii) prevent recurrences; and 20    (iii) eliminate the problems identified. The response 21    shall include the implementation and completion dates of 22    such actions. 23    (h) Training programs. The Inspector General shall (i) 24establish a comprehensive program to ensure that every person 25authorized to conduct investigations receives ongoing training 26relative to investigation techniques, communication skills,   SB2114- 23 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1and the appropriate means of interacting with persons 2receiving treatment for mental illness, developmental 3disability, or both mental illness and developmental 4disability, and (ii) establish and conduct periodic training 5programs for facility and agency employees concerning the 6prevention and reporting of any one or more of the following: 7mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, egregious 8neglect, financial exploitation, or material obstruction of an 9investigation. The Inspector General shall further ensure (i) 10every person authorized to conduct investigations at community 11agencies receives ongoing training in Title 59, Parts 115, 12116, and 119 of the Illinois Administrative Code, and (ii) 13every person authorized to conduct investigations shall 14receive ongoing training in Title 59, Part 50 of the Illinois 15Administrative Code. Nothing in this Section shall be deemed 16to prevent the Office of Inspector General from conducting any 17other training as determined by the Inspector General to be 18necessary or helpful.19    (i) Duty to cooperate. 20        (1) The Inspector General shall at all times be 21    granted access to any facility or agency for the purpose 22    of investigating any allegation, conducting unannounced 23    site visits, monitoring compliance with a written 24    response, conducting reviews of facilities and agencies, 25    or completing any other statutorily assigned duty.26        (2) Any employee who fails to cooperate with an Office   SB2114- 24 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    of the Inspector General investigation is in violation of 2    this Act. Failure to cooperate with an investigation 3    includes, but is not limited to, any one or more of the 4    following: (i) creating and transmitting a false report to 5    the Office of the Inspector General hotline, (ii) 6    providing false information to an Office of the Inspector 7    General Investigator during an investigation, (iii) 8    colluding with other employees to cover up evidence, (iv) 9    colluding with other employees to provide false 10    information to an Office of the Inspector General 11    investigator, (v) destroying evidence, (vi) withholding 12    evidence, or (vii) otherwise obstructing an Office of the 13    Inspector General investigation. Additionally, any 14    employee who, during an unannounced site visit, written 15    response compliance check, or review fails to cooperate 16    with requests from the Office of the Inspector General is 17    in violation of this Act.18    (j) Subpoena powers. The Inspector General shall have the 19power to subpoena witnesses and compel the production of all 20documents and physical evidence relating to his or her 21investigations and reviews and any hearings authorized by this 22Act. This subpoena power shall not extend to persons or 23documents of a labor organization or its representatives 24insofar as the persons are acting in a representative capacity 25to an employee whose conduct is the subject of an 26investigation or the documents relate to that representation.   SB2114- 25 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Any person who otherwise fails to respond to a subpoena or who 2knowingly provides false information to the Office of the 3Inspector General by subpoena during an investigation is 4guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.5    (k) Reporting allegations and deaths.6        (1) Allegations. If an employee witnesses, is told of, 7    or has reason to believe an incident of mental abuse, 8    physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, financial 9    exploitation, or material obstruction of an investigation 10    has occurred, the employee, agency, or facility shall 11    report the allegation by phone to the Office of the 12    Inspector General hotline according to the agency's or 13    facility's procedures, but in no event later than 4 hours 14    after the initial discovery of the incident, allegation, 15    or suspicion of any one or more of the following: mental 16    abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, financial 17    exploitation, or material obstruction of an investigation. 18    A required reporter as defined in subsection (b) of this 19    Section who knowingly or intentionally fails to comply 20    with these reporting requirements is guilty of a Class A 21    misdemeanor.22        (2) Deaths. Absent an allegation, a required reporter 23    shall, within 24 hours after initial discovery, report by 24    phone to the Office of the Inspector General hotline each 25    of the following:26            (i) Any death of an individual occurring within 14   SB2114- 26 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        calendar days after discharge or transfer of the 2        individual from a residential program or facility.3            (ii) Any death of an individual occurring within 4        24 hours after deflection from a residential program 5        or facility.6            (iii) Any other death of an individual occurring 7        at an agency or facility or at any Department-funded 8        site.9        (3) Retaliation. It is a violation of this Act for any 10    employee or administrator of an agency or facility to take 11    retaliatory action against an employee who acts in good 12    faith in conformance with his or her duties as a required 13    reporter. 14    (l) Reporting to law enforcement. Reporting criminal acts. 15Within 24 hours after determining that there is credible 16evidence indicating that a criminal act may have been 17committed or that special expertise may be required in an 18investigation, the Inspector General shall notify the Illinois 19State Police or other appropriate law enforcement authority, 20or ensure that such notification is made. The Illinois State 21Police shall investigate any report from a State-operated 22facility indicating a possible murder, sexual assault, or 23other felony by an employee. All investigations conducted by 24the Inspector General shall be conducted in a manner designed 25to ensure the preservation of evidence for possible use in a 26criminal prosecution.  SB2114- 27 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    (m) Investigative reports. Upon completion of an 2investigation, the Office of Inspector General shall issue an 3investigative report identifying whether the allegations are 4substantiated, unsubstantiated, or unfounded. Within 10 5business days after the transmittal of a completed 6investigative report substantiating an allegation, finding an 7allegation is unsubstantiated, or if a recommendation is made, 8the Inspector General shall provide the investigative report 9on the case to the Secretary and to the director of the 10facility or agency where any one or more of the following 11occurred: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, 12egregious neglect, financial exploitation, or material 13obstruction of an investigation. The director of the facility 14or agency shall be responsible for maintaining the 15confidentiality of the investigative report consistent with 16State and federal law. In a substantiated case, the 17investigative report shall include any mitigating or 18aggravating circumstances that were identified during the 19investigation. If the case involves substantiated neglect, the 20investigative report shall also state whether egregious 21neglect was found. An investigative report may also set forth 22recommendations. All investigative reports prepared by the 23Office of the Inspector General shall be considered 24confidential and shall not be released except as provided by 25the law of this State or as required under applicable federal 26law. Unsubstantiated and unfounded reports shall not be   SB2114- 28 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1disclosed except as allowed under Section 6 of the Abused and 2Neglected Long Term Care Facility Residents Reporting Act. Raw 3data used to compile the investigative report shall not be 4subject to release unless required by law or a court order. 5"Raw data used to compile the investigative report" includes, 6but is not limited to, any one or more of the following: the 7initial complaint, witness statements, photographs, 8investigator's notes, police reports, or incident reports. If 9the allegations are substantiated, the victim, the victim's 10guardian, and the accused shall be provided with a redacted 11copy of the investigative report. Death reports where there 12was no allegation of abuse or neglect shall only be released 13pursuant to applicable State or federal law or a valid court 14order. Unredacted investigative reports, as well as raw data, 15may be shared with a local law enforcement entity, a State's 16Attorney's office, or a county coroner's office upon written 17request.18    (n) Written responses, clarification requests, and 19reconsideration requests.20        (1) Written responses. Within 30 calendar days from 21    receipt of a substantiated investigative report or an 22    investigative report which contains recommendations, 23    absent a reconsideration request, the facility or agency 24    shall file a written response that addresses, in a concise 25    and reasoned manner, the actions taken to: (i) protect the 26    individual; (ii) prevent recurrences; and (iii) eliminate   SB2114- 29 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    the problems identified. The response shall include the 2    implementation and completion dates of such actions. If 3    the written response is not filed within the allotted 30 4    calendar day period, the Secretary, or the Secretary's 5    designee, shall determine the appropriate corrective 6    action to be taken.7        (2) Requests for clarification. The facility, agency, 8    victim or guardian, or the subject employee may request 9    that the Office of Inspector General clarify the finding 10    or findings for which clarification is sought. 11        (3) Requests for reconsideration. The facility, 12    agency, victim or guardian, or the subject employee may 13    request that the Office of the Inspector General 14    reconsider the finding or findings or the recommendations. 15    A request for reconsideration shall be subject to a 16    multi-layer review and shall include at least one reviewer 17    who did not participate in the investigation or approval 18    of the original investigative report. After the 19    multi-layer review process has been completed, the 20    Inspector General shall make the final determination on 21    the reconsideration request. The investigation shall be 22    reopened if the reconsideration determination finds that 23    additional information is needed to complete the 24    investigative record.25    (o) Disclosure of the finding by the Inspector General. 26The Inspector General shall disclose the finding of an   SB2114- 30 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1investigation to the following persons: (i) the Governor, (ii) 2the Secretary, (iii) the director of the facility or agency, 3(iv) the alleged victims and their guardians, (v) the 4complainant, and (vi) the accused. This information shall 5include whether the allegations were deemed substantiated, 6unsubstantiated, or unfounded.7    (p) Secretary review. Upon review of the Inspector 8General's investigative report and any agency's or facility's 9written response, the Secretary, or the Secretary's designee, 10shall accept or reject the written response and notify the 11Inspector General of that determination. The Secretary, or the 12Secretary's designee, may further direct that other 13administrative action be taken, including, but not limited to, 14any one or more of the following: (i) additional site visits, 15(ii) training, (iii) provision of technical assistance 16relative to administrative needs, licensure, or certification, 17or (iv) the imposition of appropriate sanctions.18    (q) Action by facility or agency. Within 30 days of the 19date the Secretary, or the Secretary's designee, approves the 20written response or directs that further administrative action 21be taken, the facility or agency shall provide an 22implementation report to the Inspector General that provides 23the status of the action taken. The facility or agency shall be 24allowed an additional 30 days to send notice of completion of 25the action or to send an updated implementation report. If the 26action has not been completed within the additional 30-day   SB2114- 31 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1period, the facility or agency shall send updated 2implementation reports every 60 days until completion. The 3Inspector General shall conduct a review of any implementation 4plan that takes more than 120 days after approval to complete, 5and shall monitor compliance through a random review of 6approved written responses, which may include, but are not 7limited to: (i) site visits, (ii) telephone contact, and (iii) 8requests for additional documentation evidencing compliance.9    (r) Sanctions. Sanctions, if imposed by the Secretary 10under Subdivision (p)(iv) of this Section, shall be designed 11to prevent further acts of mental abuse, physical abuse, 12sexual abuse, neglect, egregious neglect, or financial 13exploitation or some combination of one or more of those acts 14at a facility or agency, and may include any one or more of the 15following:16        (1) Appointment of on-site monitors.17        (2) Transfer or relocation of an individual or 18    individuals.19        (3) Closure of units.20        (4) Termination of any one or more of the following: 21    (i) Department licensing, (ii) funding, or (iii) 22    certification. 23    The Inspector General may seek the assistance of the 24Illinois Attorney General or the office of any State's 25Attorney in implementing sanctions. 26    (s) Health Care Worker Registry.   SB2114- 32 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (1) Reporting to the Registry. The Inspector General 2    shall report to the Department of Public Health's Health 3    Care Worker Registry, a public registry, the identity and 4    finding of each employee of a facility or agency against 5    whom there is a final investigative report prepared by the 6    Office of the Inspector General containing a substantiated 7    allegation of physical or sexual abuse, financial 8    exploitation, egregious neglect of an individual, or 9    material obstruction of an investigation, unless the 10    Inspector General requests a stipulated disposition of the 11    investigative report that does not include the reporting 12    of the employee's name to the Health Care Worker Registry 13    and the Secretary of Human Services agrees with the 14    requested stipulated disposition. 15        (2) Notice to employee. Prior to reporting the name of 16    an employee, the employee shall be notified of the 17    Department's obligation to report and shall be granted an 18    opportunity to request an administrative hearing, the sole 19    purpose of which is to determine if the substantiated 20    finding warrants reporting to the Registry. Notice to the 21    employee shall contain a clear and concise statement of 22    the grounds on which the report to the Registry is based, 23    offer the employee an opportunity for a hearing, and 24    identify the process for requesting such a hearing. Notice 25    is sufficient if provided by certified mail to the 26    employee's last known address. If the employee fails to   SB2114- 33 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    request a hearing within 30 days from the date of the 2    notice, the Inspector General shall report the name of the 3    employee to the Registry. Nothing in this subdivision 4    (s)(2) shall diminish or impair the rights of a person who 5    is a member of a collective bargaining unit under the 6    Illinois Public Labor Relations Act or under any other 7    federal labor statute. 8        (3) Registry hearings. If the employee requests an 9    administrative hearing, the employee shall be granted an 10    opportunity to appear before an administrative law judge 11    to present reasons why the employee's name should not be 12    reported to the Registry. The Department shall bear the 13    burden of presenting evidence that establishes, by a 14    preponderance of the evidence, that the substantiated 15    finding warrants reporting to the Registry. After 16    considering all the evidence presented, the administrative 17    law judge shall make a recommendation to the Secretary as 18    to whether the substantiated finding warrants reporting 19    the name of the employee to the Registry. The Secretary 20    shall render the final decision. The Department and the 21    employee shall have the right to request that the 22    administrative law judge consider a stipulated disposition 23    of these proceedings.24        (4) Testimony at Registry hearings. A person who makes 25    a report or who investigates a report under this Act shall 26    testify fully in any judicial proceeding resulting from   SB2114- 34 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    such a report, as to any evidence of physical abuse, 2    sexual abuse, egregious neglect, financial exploitation, 3    or material obstruction of an investigation, or the cause 4    thereof. No evidence shall be excluded by reason of any 5    common law or statutory privilege relating to 6    communications between the alleged perpetrator of abuse or 7    neglect, or the individual alleged as the victim in the 8    report, and the person making or investigating the report. 9    Testimony at hearings is exempt from the confidentiality 10    requirements of subsection (f) of Section 10 of the Mental 11    Health and Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act.12        (5) Employee's rights to collateral action. No 13    reporting to the Registry shall occur and no hearing shall 14    be set or proceed if an employee notifies the Inspector 15    General in writing, including any supporting 16    documentation, that he or she is formally contesting an 17    adverse employment action resulting from a substantiated 18    finding by complaint filed with the Illinois Civil Service 19    Commission, or which otherwise seeks to enforce the 20    employee's rights pursuant to any applicable collective 21    bargaining agreement. If an action taken by an employer 22    against an employee as a result of a finding of physical 23    abuse, sexual abuse, egregious neglect, financial 24    exploitation, or material obstruction of an investigation 25    is overturned through an action filed with the Illinois 26    Civil Service Commission or under any applicable   SB2114- 35 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    collective bargaining agreement and if that employee's 2    name has already been sent to the Registry, the employee's 3    name shall be removed from the Registry. 4        (6) Removal from Registry. At any time after the 5    report to the Registry, but no more than once in any 6    12-month period, an employee may petition the Department 7    in writing to remove his or her name from the Registry. 8    Upon receiving notice of such request, the Inspector 9    General shall conduct an investigation into the petition. 10    Upon receipt of such request, an administrative hearing 11    will be set by the Department. At the hearing, the 12    employee shall bear the burden of presenting evidence that 13    establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, that 14    removal of the name from the Registry is in the public 15    interest. The parties may jointly request that the 16    administrative law judge consider a stipulated disposition 17    of these proceedings. 18    (t) Review of Administrative Decisions. The Department 19shall preserve a record of all proceedings at any formal 20hearing conducted by the Department involving Health Care 21Worker Registry hearings. Final administrative decisions of 22the Department are subject to judicial review pursuant to 23provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 24    (u) Quality Care Board. There is created, within the 25Office of the Inspector General, a Quality Care Board to be 26composed of 7 members appointed by the Governor with the   SB2114- 36 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1advice and consent of the Senate. One of the members shall be 2designated as chairman by the Governor. Of the initial 3appointments made by the Governor, 4 Board members shall each 4be appointed for a term of 4 years and 3 members shall each be 5appointed for a term of 2 years. Upon the expiration of each 6member's term, a successor shall be appointed for a term of 4 7years. In the case of a vacancy in the office of any member, 8the Governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of 9the unexpired term.10    Members appointed by the Governor shall be qualified by 11professional knowledge or experience in the area of law, 12investigatory techniques, or in the area of care of the 13mentally ill or care of persons with developmental 14disabilities. Two members appointed by the Governor shall be 15persons with a disability or parents of persons with a 16disability. Members shall serve without compensation, but 17shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with 18the performance of their duties as members.19    The Board shall meet quarterly, and may hold other 20meetings on the call of the chairman. Four members shall 21constitute a quorum allowing the Board to conduct its 22business. The Board may adopt rules and regulations it deems 23necessary to govern its own procedures.24    The Board shall monitor and oversee the operations, 25policies, and procedures of the Inspector General to ensure 26the prompt and thorough investigation of allegations of   SB2114- 37 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1neglect and abuse. In fulfilling these responsibilities, the 2Board may do the following:3        (1) Provide independent, expert consultation to the 4    Inspector General on policies and protocols for 5    investigations of alleged abuse, neglect, or both abuse 6    and neglect.7        (2) Review existing regulations relating to the 8    operation of facilities.9        (3) Advise the Inspector General as to the content of 10    training activities authorized under this Section.11        (4) Recommend policies concerning methods for 12    improving the intergovernmental relationships between the 13    Office of the Inspector General and other State or federal 14    offices.15    (v) Annual report. The Inspector General shall provide to 16the General Assembly and the Governor, no later than January 1 17of each year, a summary of reports and investigations made 18under this Act for the prior fiscal year with respect to 19individuals receiving mental health or developmental 20disabilities services. The report shall detail the imposition 21of sanctions, if any, and the final disposition of any 22corrective or administrative action directed by the Secretary. 23The summaries shall not contain any confidential or 24identifying information of any individual, but shall include 25objective data identifying any trends in the number of 26reported allegations, the timeliness of the Office of the   SB2114- 38 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Inspector General's investigations, and their disposition, for 2each facility and Department-wide, for the most recent 3-year 3time period. The report shall also identify, by facility, the 4staff-to-patient ratios taking account of direct care staff 5only. The report shall also include detailed recommended 6administrative actions and matters for consideration by the 7General Assembly.8    (w) Program audit. The Auditor General shall conduct a 9program audit of the Office of the Inspector General on an 10as-needed basis, as determined by the Auditor General. The 11audit shall specifically include the Inspector General's 12compliance with the Act and effectiveness in investigating 13reports of allegations occurring in any facility or agency. 14The Auditor General shall conduct the program audit according 15to the provisions of the Illinois State Auditing Act and shall 16report its findings to the General Assembly no later than 17January 1 following the audit period.18    (x) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to mean 19that an individual is a victim of abuse or neglect because of 20health care services appropriately provided or not provided by 21health care professionals. 22    (y) Nothing in this Section shall require a facility, 23including its employees, agents, medical staff members, and 24health care professionals, to provide a service to an 25individual in contravention of that individual's stated or 26implied objection to the provision of that service on the   SB2114- 39 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1ground that that service conflicts with the individual's 2religious beliefs or practices, nor shall the failure to 3provide a service to an individual be considered abuse under 4this Section if the individual has objected to the provision 5of that service based on his or her religious beliefs or 6practices. 7(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-883, eff. 5-13-22; 8102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 103-76, eff. 6-9-23; 103-154, eff. 96-30-23; 103-752, eff. 1-1-25.) 10    Section 30. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 11Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 122605-615 as follows: 13    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-615)14    Sec. 2605-615. Illinois Forensic Science Commission.15    (a) Creation. There is created within the Illinois State 16Police the Illinois Forensic Science Commission.17    (b) Duties and purpose. The Commission shall:18        (1) Provide guidance to ensure the efficient delivery 19    of forensic services and the sound practice of forensic 20    science.21        (2) Provide a forum for discussions between forensic 22    science stakeholders to improve communication and 23    coordination and to monitor the important issues impacting 24    all stakeholders.  SB2114- 40 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (3) Take a systems-based approach in reviewing all 2    aspects of the delivery of forensic services and the sound 3    practice of forensic science with the goal of reducing or 4    eliminating the factors and inefficiencies that contribute 5    to backlogs and errors, with a focus on education and 6    training, funding, hiring, procurement, and other aspects 7    identified by the Commission.8        (4) Review significant non-conformities with the sound 9    practice of forensic science documented by each publicly 10    funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic laboratory and offer 11    recommendations for the correction thereof.12        (5) Subject to appropriation, provide educational, 13    research, and professional training opportunities for 14    practicing forensic scientists, police officers, judges, 15    State's Attorneys and Assistant State's Attorneys, Public 16    Defenders, and defense attorneys comporting with the sound 17    practice of forensic science.18        (6) Collect and analyze information related to the 19    impact of current laws, rules, policies, and practices on 20    forensic crime laboratories and the practice of forensic 21    science; evaluate the impact of those laws, rules, 22    policies, and practices on forensic crime laboratories and 23    the practice of forensic science; identify new policies 24    and approaches, together with changes in science, and 25    technology; and make recommendations for changes to those 26    laws, rules, policies, and practices that will yield   SB2114- 41 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    better results in the criminal justice system consistent 2    with the sound practice of forensic science.3        (7) Perform such other studies or tasks pertaining to 4    forensic crime laboratories as may be requested by the 5    General Assembly by resolution or the Governor, and 6    perform such other functions as may be required by law or 7    as are necessary to carry out the purposes and goals of the 8    Commission prescribed in this Section.9        (8) Ensure that adequate resources and facilities are 10    available for carrying out the changes proposed in 11    legislation, rules, or policies and that rational 12    priorities are established for the use of those resources. 13    To do so, the Commission may prepare statements to the 14    Governor and General Assembly identifying the fiscal and 15    practical effects of proposed legislation, rules, or 16    policy changes. Such statements may include, but are not 17    limited to: the impact on present levels of staffing and 18    resources; a professional opinion on the practical value 19    of the change or changes; the increase or decrease the 20    number of crime laboratories; the increase or decrease the 21    cost of operating crime laboratories; the impact on 22    efficiencies and caseloads; other information, including 23    but not limited to, facts, data, research, and science 24    relevant to the legislation, rule, or policy; the direct 25    or indirect alteration in any process involving or used by 26    crime laboratories of such proposed legislation, rules, or   SB2114- 42 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    policy changes; an analysis of the impact, either directly 2    or indirectly, on the technology, improvements, or 3    practices of forensic analyses for use in criminal 4    proceedings; together with the direct or indirect impact 5    on headcount, space, equipment, instruments, 6    accreditation, the volume of cases for analysis, 7    scientific controls, and quality assurance.8    (c) Members. The Commission shall be composed of the 9Director of the Illinois State Police, or his or her designee, 10together with the following members appointed for a term of 4 11years by the Governor with the advice and consent of the 12Senate:13        (1) One crime laboratory director or administrator 14    from each publicly funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic 15    laboratory system.16        (2) One member with experience in the admission of 17    forensic evidence in trials from a statewide association 18    representing prosecutors.19        (3) One member with experience in the admission of 20    forensic evidence in trials from a statewide association 21    representing criminal defense attorneys.22        (4) Three forensic scientists with bench work 23    background from various forensic disciplines (e.g., DNA, 24    chemistry, pattern evidence, etc.).25        (5) One retired circuit court judge or associate 26    circuit court judge with criminal trial experience,   SB2114- 43 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    including experience in the admission of forensic evidence 2    in trials.3        (6) One academic specializing in the field of forensic 4    sciences.5        (7) One or more community representatives (e.g., 6    victim advocates, innocence project organizations, sexual 7    assault examiners, etc.).8        (8) One member who is a medical examiner or coroner. 9    The Governor shall designate one of the members of the 10Commission to serve as the chair of the Commission. The 11members of the Commission shall elect from their number such 12other officers as they may determine. Members of the 13Commission shall serve without compensation, but may be 14reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance 15of their duties from funds appropriated for that purpose.16    (d) Subcommittees. The Commission may form subcommittees 17to study specific issues identified under paragraph (3) of 18subsection (b), including, but not limited to, subcommittees 19on education and training, procurement, funding and hiring. Ad 20hoc subcommittees may also be convened to address other 21issues. Such subcommittees shall meet as needed to complete 22their work, and shall report their findings back to the 23Commission. Subcommittees shall include members of the 24Commission, and may also include non-members such as forensic 25science stakeholders and subject matter experts.26    (e) Meetings. The Commission shall meet quarterly, at the   SB2114- 44 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1call of the chairperson. Facilities for meeting, whether 2remotely or in person, shall be provided for the Commission by 3the Illinois State Police.4    (f) Reporting by publicly funded ISO 17025 accredited 5forensic laboratories. All State and local publicly funded ISO 617025 accredited forensic laboratory systems, including, but 7not limited to, the DuPage County Forensic Science Center, the 8Northeastern Illinois Regional Crime Laboratory, and the 9Illinois State Police, shall annually provide to the 10Commission a report summarizing its significant 11non-conformities with the efficient delivery of forensic 12services and the sound practice of forensic science. The 13report will identify: each significant non-conformity or 14deficient method; how the non-conformity or deficient method 15was detected; the nature and extent of the non-conformity or 16deficient method; all corrective actions implemented to 17address the non-conformity or deficient method; and an 18analysis of the effectiveness of the corrective actions taken.19    (g) Definition. As used in this Section, "Commission" 20means the Illinois Forensic Science Commission.21(Source: P.A. 102-523, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 22103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    Section 35. The Capital Development Board Act is amended 24by changing Section 5 as follows:   SB2114- 45 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    (20 ILCS 3105/5)  (from Ch. 127, par. 775)2    Sec. 5. The Board shall consist of 7 members, no more than 34 of whom may be of the same political party, all of whom shall 4be appointed by the Governor, by and with the consent of the 5Senate, and one of whom shall be designated as chairman by the 6Governor. No person may be appointed as a member of the Board 7who is serving as an elected officer for the State or for any 8unit of local government within the State.9    If the Senate is not in session when the first 10appointments are made, the Governor shall make temporary 11appointments as in the case of a vacancy. In making the first 12appointments, the Governor shall designate 2 members to serve 13until January, 1974, 2 members to serve until January, 1975, 2 14members to serve until January, 1976 and 1 member to serve 15until January, 1977, or until their successors are appointed 16and qualified. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 17contrary, the term of office of each member of the Board is 18abolished on January 31, 2019. Incumbent members holding a 19position on the Board on January 30, 2019 may be reappointed. 20In making appointments to fill the vacancies created on 21January 31, 2019, the Governor shall designate 2 members to 22serve until January 31, 2021, 2 members to serve until January 2331, 2022, 2 members to serve until January 31, 2023, and one 24member to serve until January 31, 2024, or until their 25successors are appointed and qualified. Their successors shall 26be appointed to serve for 4 year terms expiring on the third   SB2114- 46 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Monday in January or until their successors are appointed and 2qualified. Any vacancy occurring on the Board, whether by 3death, resignation or otherwise, shall be filled by 4appointment by the Governor in the same manner as original 5appointments. A member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve 6for the remainder of the unexpired term or until his successor 7is qualified.8(Source: P.A. 100-1189, eff. 4-5-19.) 9    Section 40. The Abraham Lincoln Presidential Library and 10Museum Act is amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 11    (20 ILCS 3475/20)12    Sec. 20. Composition of the Board. The Board of Trustees 13shall consist of 11 members to be appointed by the Governor, 14with the advice and consent of the Senate. The Board shall 15consist of members with the following qualifications:16        (1) One member shall have recognized knowledge and 17    ability in matters related to business administration.18        (2) One member shall have recognized knowledge and 19    ability in matters related to the history of Abraham 20    Lincoln.21        (3) One member shall have recognized knowledge and 22    ability in matters related to the history of Illinois. 23        (4) One member shall have recognized knowledge and 24    ability in matters related to library and museum studies.  SB2114- 47 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (5) One member shall have recognized knowledge and 2    ability in matters related to historic preservation.3        (6) One member shall have recognized knowledge and 4    ability in matters related to cultural tourism.5        (7) One member shall have recognized knowledge and 6    ability in matters related to conservation, digitization, 7    and technological innovation.8    The initial terms of office shall be designated by the 9Governor as follows: one member to serve for a term of one 10year, 2 members to serve for a term of 2 years, 2 members to 11serve for a term of 3 years, 2 members to serve for a term of 4 12years, 2 members to serve for a term of 5 years, and 2 members 13to serve for a term of 6 years. Thereafter, all appointments 14shall be for a term of 6 years. The Governor shall appoint one 15of the members to serve as chairperson at the pleasure of the 16Governor.17    The members of the Board shall serve without compensation 18but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary 19expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties 20as members of the Board from funds appropriated for that 21purpose.22(Source: P.A. 102-985, eff. 1-1-23.) 23    Section 45. The Illinois Housing Development Act is 24amended by changing Section 4 as follows:   SB2114- 48 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    (20 ILCS 3805/4)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 304)2    Sec. 4. There is hereby created a body politic and 3corporate to be known as the Illinois Housing Development 4Authority. The Authority shall consist of 9 members, including 5a senior citizen age 60 or older, of whom not more than three 6shall be from any one county in the State and of whom not more 7than 5 shall be of any one political party. The Governor shall 8appoint the members of the Authority by and with the advice and 9consent of the Senate. Three members first appointed shall 10hold office until the second Monday in January, 1971 and until 11their successors are appointed and qualified and four members 12shall hold office until the second Monday in January, 1973 and 13until their successors are appointed and qualified. The 14members first appointed under this amendatory Act of 1984 15shall serve for a term of 4 years, commencing with the second 16Monday in January, 1985. After the expiration of the terms of 17office of those first appointed, their respective successors 18shall hold office from the second Monday in January of the year 19of their respective appointments for a term of four years and 20until their successors are appointed and qualified. In case of 21vacancies in such offices during the recess of the Senate, the 22Governor shall appoint a replacement member who make a 23temporary appointment until the next meeting of the Senate 24when he shall nominate some person to fill such office, and any 25person so nominated, who is confirmed by the Senate, shall 26hold his office during the remainder of the term and until his   SB2114- 49 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1successor shall be appointed and qualified. If the Senate is 2not in session at the time this provision takes effect, the 3Governor shall make a temporary appointment as in the case of a 4vacancy.5(Source: P.A. 83-1538.) 6    Section 50. The Guardianship and Advocacy Act is amended 7by changing Section 4 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 3955/4)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 704)9    Sec. 4. (a) The Commission shall consist of 11 members, 10one of whom shall be a senior citizen age 60 or over, who shall 11be appointed by the Governor, taking into account the 12requirements of State and federal statutes, with the advice 13and consent of the Senate.14    All appointments shall be filed with the Secretary of 15State by the appointing authority.16    (b) The terms of the original members shall be 3 one year 17terms, 3 two year terms, and 3 three year terms, all terms to 18continue until a successor is appointed and qualified. The 19length of the terms of the original members shall be drawn by 20lot of the first meeting held by the Commission. The members 21first appointed under this amendatory Act of 1984 shall serve 22for a term of 3 years. Thereafter all terms shall be for 3 23years, with each member serving no more than 2 consecutive 24terms. Vacancies in the membership are to be filled in the same   SB2114- 50 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1manner as original appointments. Appointments to fill 2vacancies occurring before the expiration of a term are for 3the remainder of the unexpired term. A member of the 4Commission shall serve for a term ending on June 30 and until 5his successor is appointed and qualified.6    (c) The Commission shall annually elect a Chairman and any 7other officers it deems necessary. The Commission shall meet 8at least once every 3 months with the times and places of 9meetings determined by the Chairman. Additional meetings may 10be called by the Chairman upon written notice 7 days before the 11meeting or by written petition of 5 members to the Chairman. 12Six members of the Commission constitute a quorum.13    (d) Members of the Commission are not entitled to 14compensation but shall receive reimbursement for actual 15expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.16(Source: P.A. 83-1538.) 17    Section 55. The Illinois Workforce Innovation Board Act is 18amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 19    (20 ILCS 3975/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 2103)20    Sec. 3. Illinois Workforce Innovation Board. 21    (a) The Illinois Workforce Innovation Board shall include:22        (1) the Governor;23        (2) 2 members of the House of Representatives 24    appointed by the Speaker of the House and 2 members of the   SB2114- 51 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; 2        (3) for appointments made prior to the effective date 3    of this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, 4    persons appointed by the Governor, with the advice and 5    consent of the Senate (except in the case of a person 6    holding an office or employment described in subparagraph 7    (F) when appointment to the office or employment requires 8    the advice and consent of the Senate), from among the 9    following:10            (A) representatives of business in this State who 11        (i) are owners of businesses, chief executives or 12        operating officers of businesses, or other business 13        executives or employers with optimum policymaking or 14        hiring authority, including members of local boards 15        described in Section 117(b)(2)(A)(i) of the federal 16        Workforce Investment Act of 1998; (ii) represent 17        businesses with employment opportunities that reflect 18        the employment opportunities in the State; and (iii) 19        are appointed from among individuals nominated by 20        State business organizations and business trade 21        associations;22            (B) chief elected officials from cities and 23        counties;24            (C) representatives of labor organizations who 25        have been nominated by State labor federations;26            (D) representatives of individuals or   SB2114- 52 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        organizations that have experience with youth 2        activities;3            (E) representatives of individuals or 4        organizations that have experience and expertise in 5        the delivery of workforce investment activities, 6        including chief executive officers of community 7        colleges and community-based organizations within the 8        State;9            (F) the lead State agency officials with 10        responsibility for the programs and activities that 11        are described in Section 121(b) of the federal 12        Workforce Investment Act of 1998 and carried out by 13        one-stop partners and, in any case in which no lead 14        State agency official has responsibility for such a 15        program, service, or activity, a representative in the 16        State with expertise in such program, service, or 17        activity; and18            (G) any other representatives and State agency 19        officials that the Governor may appoint, including, 20        but not limited to, one or more representatives of 21        local public education, post-secondary institutions, 22        secondary or post-secondary vocational education 23        institutions, and community-based organizations; and24        (4) for appointments made on or after the effective 25    date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, 26    persons appointed by the Governor in accordance with   SB2114- 53 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    Section 101 of the federal Workforce Innovation and 2    Opportunity Act, subject to the advice and consent of the 3    Senate (except in the case of a person holding an office or 4    employment with the Department of Commerce and Economic 5    Opportunity, the Illinois Community College Board, the 6    Department of Employment Security, or the Department of 7    Human Services when appointment to the office or 8    employment requires the consent of the Senate). 9        Appointments made under this paragraph (4) shall 10    include 2 representatives of community-based organizations 11    that provide or support competitive, integrated employment 12    for individuals with disabilities. These 2 representatives 13    shall be individuals who self-identify as persons with 14    intellectual or developmental disabilities, and who are 15    engaged in advocacy for the rights of individuals with 16    disabilities. If these persons require support in the form 17    of reasonable accommodations in order to participate, such 18    support shall be provided. 19    (b) (Blank).20    (c) (Blank).21    (d) The Governor shall select a chairperson as provided in 22the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.23    (d-5) (Blank).24    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, this 25amendatory Act of the 92nd General Assembly does not affect 26the tenure of any member appointed to and serving on the   SB2114- 54 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Illinois Human Resource Investment Council on the effective 2date of this amendatory Act of the 92nd General Assembly. 3Members of the Board nominated for appointment in 2000, 2001, 4or 2002 shall serve for fixed and staggered terms, as 5designated by the Governor, expiring no later than July 1 of 6the second calendar year succeeding their respective 7appointments or until their successors are appointed and 8qualified. Members of the Board nominated for appointment 9after 2002 shall serve for terms expiring on July 1 of the 10second calendar year succeeding their respective appointments, 11or until their successors are appointed and qualified. A State 12official or employee serving on the Board under subparagraph 13(F) of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) by virtue of his or her 14State office or employment shall serve during the term of that 15office or employment. A vacancy is created in situations 16including, but not limited to, those in which an individual 17serving on the Board ceases to satisfy all of the requirements 18for appointment under the provision under which he or she was 19appointed. The Governor may at any time make appointments to 20fill vacancies for the balance of an unexpired term. Vacancies 21shall be filled in the same manner as the original 22appointment. Members shall serve without compensation, but 23shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the 24performance of their duties.25    (f) The Board shall meet at least 4 times per calendar year 26at times and in places that it deems necessary. The Board shall   SB2114- 55 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1be subject to the Open Meetings Act and, to the extent required 2by that law, its meetings shall be publicly announced and open 3and accessible to the general public. The Board shall adopt 4any rules and operating procedures that it deems necessary to 5carry out its responsibilities under this Act and under the 6federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.7(Source: P.A. 100-477, eff. 9-8-17; 100-891, eff. 1-1-19.) 8    Section 60. The Commission on Discrimination and Hate 9Crimes Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 10    (20 ILCS 4070/10)11    Sec. 10. Establishment of Commission. 12    (a) The Commission on Discrimination and Hate Crimes is 13established. The Commission shall consist of a chairperson and 1420 additional members appointed by the Governor with the 15advice and consent of the Senate. The membership may include, 16but is not limited to, persons who are active in and 17knowledgeable about the areas of law enforcement, the criminal 18and civil justice systems, education, human rights, business 19and industry, arts and culture, social services, and religion. 20Terms of the members shall be staggered so that 10 of the 21initial members shall serve until March 1, 2009, 10 of the 22initial members and the initial chairperson shall serve until 23March 1, 2011, and thereafter each member shall serve for a 24term of 4 years. Members shall serve until their successors   SB2114- 56 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1are appointed and qualified. Any vacancy in the membership of 2the Council shall be filled by the Governor with the advice and 3consent of the Senate for the unexpired term. Members shall 4serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for 5expenses.6    (b) The Commission shall be provided assistance and 7necessary staff support services by the agencies of State 8government involved in the issues to be addressed by it. 9(Source: P.A. 95-425, eff. 8-24-07.) 10    Section 65. The Blue-Ribbon Commission on Transportation 11Infrastructure Funding and Policy Act is amended by changing 12Section 10 as follows: 13    (20 ILCS 4116/10)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on August 1, 2025)15    Sec. 10. Commission created.16    (a) The Blue-Ribbon Commission on Transportation 17Infrastructure Funding and Policy is created within the 18Department of Transportation consisting of members appointed 19as follows:20        (1) Four members of the House of Representatives, with 21    2 to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of 22    Representatives and 2 to be appointed by the Minority 23    Leader of the House of Representatives.24        (2) Four members of the Senate, with 2 to be appointed   SB2114- 57 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    by the President of the Senate and 2 to be appointed by the 2    Minority Leader of the Senate.3        (3) Eight members appointed by the Governor with the 4    advice and consent of the Senate.5        (4) The chair of the Commission to be appointed by the 6    Governor from among his 8 appointments.7    (b) Members shall have expertise, knowledge, or experience 8in transportation infrastructure development, construction, 9workforce, or policy. Members shall also represent a diverse 10set of sectors, including the labor, engineering, 11construction, transit, active transportation, rail, air, or 12other sectors, and shall include participants of the 13Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Program. No more than 2 14appointees shall be members of the same sector.15    (c) Members shall represent geographically diverse regions 16of the State.17    (d) Members shall be appointed by June 30, 2023.18(Source: P.A. 102-988, eff. 5-27-22; 102-1129, eff. 2-10-23; 19reenacted by P.A. 103-461, eff. 8-4-23.) 20    Section 70. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 21changing Sections 14-134, 15-159, 16-164, 22A-109, and 22B-115 22as follows: 23    (40 ILCS 5/14-134)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 14-134)24    Sec. 14-134. Board created. The retirement system created   SB2114- 58 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1by this Article shall be a trust, separate and distinct from 2all other entities. The responsibility for the operation of 3the system and for making effective this Article is vested in a 4board of trustees.5    The board shall consist of 7 trustees, as follows:6    (a) the Director of the Governor's Office of Management 7and Budget; (b) the Comptroller; (c) one trustee, not a State 8employee, who shall be Chairman, to be appointed by the 9Governor for a 5 year term; (d) two members of the system, one 10of whom shall be an annuitant age 60 or over, having at least 8 11years of creditable service, to be appointed by the Governor 12for terms of 5 years; (e) one member of the system having at 13least 8 years of creditable service, to be elected from the 14contributing membership of the system by the contributing 15members as provided in Section 14-134.1; (f) one annuitant of 16the system who has been an annuitant for at least one full 17year, to be elected from and by the annuitants of the system, 18as provided in Section 14-134.1. The Director of the 19Governor's Office of Management and Budget and the Comptroller 20shall be ex-officio members and shall serve as trustees during 21their respective terms of office, except that each of them may 22designate another officer or employee from the same agency to 23serve in his or her place. However, no ex-officio member may 24designate a different proxy within one year after designating 25a proxy unless the person last so designated has become 26ineligible to serve in that capacity. Except for the elected   SB2114- 59 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1trustees, any vacancy in the office of trustee shall be filled 2in the same manner as the office was filled previously.3    A trustee shall serve until a successor qualifies, except 4that a trustee who is a member of the system shall be 5disqualified as a trustee immediately upon terminating service 6with the State.7    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 8contrary, the term of office of each trustee of the board 9appointed by the Governor who is sitting on the board on the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 11Assembly is terminated on that effective date.12    Beginning on the 90th day after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the board shall 14consist of 13 trustees as follows:15        (1) the Comptroller, who shall be the Chairperson;16        (2) six persons appointed by the Governor with the 17    advice and consent of the Senate who may not be members of 18    the system or hold an elective State office and who shall 19    serve for a term of 5 years, except that the terms of the 20    initial appointees under this amendatory Act of the 96th 21    General Assembly shall be as follows: 3 for a term of 3 22    years and 3 for a term of 5 years;23        (3) four active participants of the system having at 24    least 8 years of creditable service, to be elected from 25    the contributing members of the system by the contribution 26    members as provided in Section 14-134.1; and  SB2114- 60 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (4) two annuitants of the system who have been 2    annuitants for at least one full year, to be elected from 3    and by the annuitants of the system, as provided in 4    Section 14-134.1.5    For the purposes of this Section, the Governor may make a 6nomination and the Senate may confirm the nominee in advance 7of the commencement of the nominee's term of office. The 8Governor shall make nominations for appointment to the board 9under this Section within 60 days after the effective date of 10this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. A trustee 11sitting on the board on the effective date of this amendatory 12Act of the 96th General Assembly may not hold over in office 13for more than 90 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. Nothing in this 15Section shall prevent the Governor from making a temporary 16appointment or nominating a trustee holding office on the day 17before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th 18General Assembly. 19    Each trustee is entitled to one vote on the board, and 4 20trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of 21business. The affirmative votes of a majority of the trustees 22present, but at least 3 trustees, shall be necessary for 23action by the board at any meeting. On the 90th day after the 24effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 25Assembly, 7 trustees shall constitute a quorum for the 26transaction of business and the affirmative vote of a majority   SB2114- 61 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1of the trustees present, but at least 7 trustees, shall be 2necessary for action by the board at any meeting. The board's 3action of July 22, 1986, by which it amended the bylaws of the 4system to increase the number of affirmative votes required 5for board action from 3 to 4 (in response to Public Act 684-1028, which increased the number of trustees from 5 to 7), 7and the board's rejection, between that date and the effective 8date of this amendatory Act of 1993, of proposed actions not 9receiving at least 4 affirmative votes, are hereby validated.10    The trustees shall serve without compensation, but shall 11be reimbursed from the funds of the system for all necessary 12expenses incurred through service on the board.13    Each trustee shall take an oath of office that he or she 14will diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the 15system, and will not knowingly violate or willfully permit the 16violation of any of the provisions of law applicable to the 17system. The oath shall be subscribed to by the trustee making 18it, certified by the officer before whom it is taken, and filed 19with the Secretary of State. A trustee shall qualify for 20membership on the board when the oath has been approved by the 21board.22(Source: P.A. 96-6, eff. 4-3-09.) 23    (40 ILCS 5/15-159)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 15-159)24    Sec. 15-159. Board created. 25    (a) A board of trustees constituted as provided in this   SB2114- 62 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Section shall administer this System. The board shall be known 2as the Board of Trustees of the State Universities Retirement 3System.4    (b) (Blank).5    (c) (Blank).6    (d) Beginning on the 90th day after April 3, 2009 (the 7effective date of Public Act 96-6), the Board of Trustees 8shall be constituted as follows: 9        (1) The Chairperson of the Board of Higher Education.10        (2) Four trustees appointed by the Governor with the 11    advice and consent of the Senate who may not be members of 12    the system or hold an elective State office and who shall 13    serve for a term of 6 years, except that the terms of the 14    initial appointees under this subsection (d) shall be as 15    follows: 2 for a term of 3 years and 2 for a term of 6 16    years. The term of an appointed trustee shall terminate 17    immediately upon becoming a member of the system or being 18    sworn into an elective State office, and the position 19    shall be considered to be vacant and shall be filled 20    pursuant to subsection (f) of this Section. 21        (3) Four participating employees of the system to be 22    elected from the contributing membership of the system by 23    the contributing members, no more than 2 of which may be 24    from any of the University of Illinois campuses, who shall 25    serve for a term of 6 years, except that the terms of the 26    initial electees shall be as follows: 2 for a term of 3   SB2114- 63 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    years and 2 for a term of 6 years. 2        (4) Two annuitants of the system who have been 3    annuitants for at least one full year, to be elected from 4    and by the annuitants of the system, no more than one of 5    which may be from any of the University of Illinois 6    campuses, who shall serve for a term of 6 years, except 7    that the terms of the initial electees shall be as 8    follows: one for a term of 3 years and one for a term of 6 9    years. 10    The chairperson of the Board shall be appointed by the 11Governor from among the trustees. 12    For the purposes of this Section, the Governor may make a 13nomination and the Senate may confirm the nominee in advance 14of the commencement of the nominee's term of office. 15    (e) The 6 elected trustees shall be elected within 90 days 16after April 3, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-6) for 17a term beginning on the 90th day after that effective date. 18Trustees shall be elected thereafter as terms expire for a 196-year term beginning July 15 next following their election, 20and such election shall be held on May 1, or on May 2 when May 211 falls on a Sunday. The board may establish rules for the 22election of trustees to implement the provisions of Public Act 2396-6 and for future elections. Candidates for the 24participating trustee shall be nominated by petitions in 25writing, signed by not less than 400 participants with their 26addresses shown opposite their names. Candidates for the   SB2114- 64 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1annuitant trustee shall be nominated by petitions in writing, 2signed by not less than 100 annuitants with their addresses 3shown opposite their names. If there is more than one 4qualified nominee for each elected trustee, then the board 5shall conduct a secret ballot election by mail for that 6trustee, in accordance with rules as established by the board. 7If there is only one qualified person nominated by petition 8for each elected trustee, then the election as required by 9this Section shall not be conducted for that trustee and the 10board shall declare such nominee duly elected. A vacancy 11occurring in the elective membership of the board shall be 12filled for the unexpired term by the elected trustees serving 13on the board for the remainder of the term. Nothing in this 14subsection shall preclude the adoption of rules providing for 15internet or phone balloting in addition, or as an alternative, 16to election by mail. 17    (f) A vacancy in the appointed membership on the board of 18trustees caused by resignation, death, expiration of term of 19office, or other reason shall be filled by a qualified person 20appointed by the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired 21term.22    (g) Trustees shall continue in office until their 23respective successors are appointed and have qualified, except 24that a trustee elected to one of the participating employee 25positions after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 26the 102nd General Assembly shall be disqualified immediately   SB2114- 65 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1upon the termination of his or her status as a participating 2employee and a trustee elected to one of the annuitant 3positions after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 4the 102nd General Assembly shall be disqualified immediately 5upon the termination of his or her status as an annuitant 6receiving a retirement annuity.7    An elected trustee who is incumbent on the effective date 8of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly whose 9status as a participating employee or annuitant has terminated 10after having been elected shall continue to serve in the 11participating employee or annuitant position to which he or 12she was elected for the remainder of the term. 13    (h) Each trustee must take an oath of office before a 14notary public of this State and shall qualify as a trustee upon 15the presentation to the board of a certified copy of the oath. 16The oath must state that the person will diligently and 17honestly administer the affairs of the retirement system, and 18will not knowingly violate or willfully permit to be violated 19any provisions of this Article.20    Each trustee shall serve without compensation but shall be 21reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in attending 22board meetings and carrying out his or her duties as a trustee 23or officer of the system.24(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-210, eff. 7-30-21.) 25    (40 ILCS 5/16-164)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 16-164)  SB2114- 66 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    Sec. 16-164. Board; appointed members; vacancies. Terms of 2office for the appointed members shall begin on July 15 of an 3even-numbered year, except that the terms of office for 4members appointed pursuant to this amendatory Act of the 96th 5General Assembly shall begin upon being confirmed by the 6Senate. The Governor shall appoint 3 members as trustees with 7the advice and consent of the Senate in each even-numbered 8year who shall hold office for a term of 4 years, except that, 9of the members appointed pursuant to this amendatory Act of 10the 96th General Assembly, 3 members shall be appointed for a 11term ending July 14, 2012 and 3 members shall be appointed for 12a term ending July 14, 2014. The Governor shall appoint the 13additional member authorized under this amendatory Act of the 14101st General Assembly with the advice and consent of the 15Senate for a term beginning on July 15, 2020 and ending July 1614, 2022, and successors shall hold office for a term of 4 17years. Each such appointee shall reside in and be a taxpayer in 18the territory covered by this system, shall be interested in 19public school welfare, and experienced and competent in 20financial and business management. A vacancy in the term of an 21appointed trustee shall be filled for the unexpired term by 22appointment of the Governor.23    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 24contrary, the term of office of each member of the Board 25appointed by the Governor who is sitting on the Board on the 26effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General   SB2114- 67 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Assembly is terminated on that effective date. A trustee 2sitting on the Board on the effective date of this amendatory 3Act of the 96th General Assembly may not hold over in office 4for more than 60 days after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. Nothing in this 6Section shall prevent the Governor from making a temporary 7appointment or nominating a trustee holding office on the day 8before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th 9General Assembly. 10(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20.) 11    (40 ILCS 5/22A-109)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 22A-109)12    Sec. 22A-109. Membership of board. The board shall consist 13of the following members: 14        (1) Five trustees appointed by the Governor with the 15    advice and consent of the Senate who may not hold an 16    elective State office. 17        (2) The Treasurer.18        (3) The Comptroller, who shall represent the State 19    Employees' Retirement System of Illinois. 20        (4) The Chairperson of the General Assembly Retirement 21    System.22        (5) The Chairperson of the Judges Retirement System of 23    Illinois. 24The appointive members shall serve for terms of 4 years except 25that the terms of office of the original appointive members   SB2114- 68 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1pursuant to this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly 2shall be as follows: One member for a term of 1 year; 1 member 3for a term of 2 years; 1 member for a term of 3 years; and 2 4members for a term of 4 years. Vacancies among the appointive 5members shall be filled for unexpired terms by appointment in 6like manner as for original appointments, and appointive 7members shall continue in office until their successors have 8been appointed and have qualified.9    Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 10contrary, the term of office of each trustee of the Board 11appointed by the Governor who is sitting on the Board on the 12effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 13Assembly is terminated on that effective date. A trustee 14sitting on the board on the effective date of this amendatory 15Act of the 96th General Assembly may not hold over in office 16for more than 60 days after the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. Nothing in this 18Section shall prevent the Governor from making a temporary 19appointment or nominating a trustee holding office on the day 20before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th 21General Assembly. 22    Each person appointed to membership shall qualify by 23taking an oath of office before the Secretary of State stating 24that he will diligently and honestly administer the affairs of 25the board and will not violate or knowingly permit the 26violation of any provisions of this Article.  SB2114- 69 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    Members of the board shall receive no salary for service 2on the board but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses 3incurred while on business for the board according to the 4standards in effect for members of the Commission on 5Government Forecasting and Accountability.6    A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a 7quorum. The board shall elect from its membership, biennially, 8a Chairman, Vice Chairman and a Recording Secretary. These 9officers, together with one other member elected by the board, 10shall constitute the executive committee. During the interim 11between regular meetings of the board, the executive committee 12shall have authority to conduct all business of the board and 13shall report such business conducted at the next following 14meeting of the board for ratification.15    No member of the board shall have any interest in any 16brokerage fee, commission or other profit or gain arising out 17of any investment made by the board. This paragraph does not 18preclude ownership by any member of any minority interest in 19any common stock or any corporate obligation in which 20investment is made by the board.21    The board shall contract for a blanket fidelity bond in 22the penal sum of not less than $1,000,000.00 to cover members 23of the board, the director and all other employees of the board 24conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of 25their respective offices, the premium on which shall be paid 26by the board.  SB2114- 70 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1(Source: P.A. 99-708, eff. 7-29-16; 100-1148, eff. 12-10-18.) 2    (40 ILCS 5/22B-115)3    Sec. 22B-115. Board of Trustees of the Fund.4    (a) No later than one month after the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly or as soon 6thereafter as may be practicable, the Governor shall appoint, 7by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, a transition 8board of trustees consisting of 9 members as follows:9        (1) three members representing municipalities who are 10    mayors, presidents, chief executive officers, chief 11    financial officers, or other officers, executives, or 12    department heads of municipalities and appointed from 13    among candidates recommended by the Illinois Municipal 14    League;15        (2) three members representing participants and who 16    are participants, 2 of whom shall be appointed from among 17    candidates recommended by a statewide fraternal 18    organization representing more than 20,000 active and 19    retired police officers in the State of Illinois, and one 20    of whom shall be appointed from among candidates 21    recommended by a benevolent association representing sworn 22    police officers in the State of Illinois;23        (3) two members representing beneficiaries and who are 24    beneficiaries, one of whom shall be appointed from among 25    candidates recommended by a statewide fraternal   SB2114- 71 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    organization representing more than 20,000 active and 2    retired police officers in the State of Illinois, and one 3    of whom shall be appointed from among candidates 4    recommended by a benevolent association representing sworn 5    police officers in the State of Illinois; and6        (4) one member who is a representative of the Illinois 7    Municipal League.8    The transition board members shall serve until the initial 9permanent board members are elected and qualified.10    The transition board of trustees shall select the 11chairperson of the transition board of trustees from among the 12trustees for the duration of the transition board's tenure.13    (b) The permanent board of trustees shall consist of 9 14members as follows:15        (1) Three members who are mayors, presidents, chief 16    executive officers, chief financial officers, or other 17    officers, executives, or department heads of 18    municipalities that have participating pension funds and 19    are elected by the mayors and presidents of municipalities 20    that have participating pension funds.21        (2) Three members who are participants of 22    participating pension funds and are elected by the 23    participants of participating pension funds.24        (3) Two members who are beneficiaries of participating 25    pension funds and are elected by the beneficiaries of 26    participating pension funds.  SB2114- 72 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (4) One member recommended by the Illinois Municipal 2    League who shall be appointed by the Governor with the 3    advice and consent of the Senate.4    The permanent board of trustees shall select the 5chairperson of the permanent board of trustees from among the 6trustees for a term of 2 years. The holder of the office of 7chairperson shall alternate between a person elected or 8appointed under item (1) or (4) of this subsection (b) and a 9person elected under item (2) or (3) of this subsection (b).10    (c) Each trustee shall qualify by taking an oath of office 11before the Secretary of State or the legal counsel of the fund 12stating that he or she will diligently and honestly administer 13the affairs of the board and will not violate or knowingly 14permit the violation of any provision of this Article.15    (d) Trustees shall receive no salary for service on the 16board but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred 17while on business for the board according to Article 1 of this 18Code and rules adopted by the board.19    A municipality employing a police officer who is an 20elected or appointed trustee of the board must allow 21reasonable time off with compensation for the police officer 22to conduct official business related to his or her position on 23the board, including time for travel. The board shall notify 24the municipality in advance of the dates, times, and locations 25of this official business. The Fund shall timely reimburse the 26municipality for the reasonable costs incurred that are due to   SB2114- 73 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1the police officer's absence. 2    (e) No trustee shall have any interest in any brokerage 3fee, commission, or other profit or gain arising out of any 4investment directed by the board. This subsection does not 5preclude ownership by any member of any minority interest in 6any common stock or any corporate obligation in which an 7investment is directed by the board. 8    (f) Notwithstanding any provision or interpretation of law 9to the contrary, any member of the transition board may also be 10elected or appointed as a member of the permanent board.11    Notwithstanding any provision or interpretation of law to 12the contrary, any trustee of a fund established under Article 133 of this Code may also be appointed as a member of the 14transition board or elected or appointed as a member of the 15permanent board.16    The restriction in Section 3.1 of the Lobbyist 17Registration Act shall not apply to a member of the transition 18board appointed pursuant to item (4) of subsection (a) or to a 19member of the permanent board appointed pursuant to item (4) 20of subsection (b). 21(Source: P.A. 103-506, eff. 8-4-23.) 22    Section 75. The Mid-Illinois Medical District Act is 23amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 24    (70 ILCS 925/10)  SB2114- 74 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    Sec. 10. Mid-Illinois Medical District Commission. 2    (a) There is created a body politic and corporate under 3the corporate name of the Mid-Illinois Medical District 4Commission whose general purpose, in addition to and not in 5limitation of those purposes and powers set forth in this Act, 6is to:7        (1) maintain the proper surroundings for a medical 8    center and a related technology center in order to 9    attract, stabilize, and retain within the District 10    hospitals, clinics, research facilities, educational 11    facilities, or other facilities permitted under this Act;12        (2) provide for the orderly creation, maintenance, 13    development, and expansion of (i) health care facilities 14    and other ancillary or related facilities that the 15    Commission may from time to time determine are established 16    and operated (A) for any aspect of the carrying out of the 17    Commission's purposes as set forth in this Act, (B) for 18    the study, diagnosis, and treatment of human ailments and 19    injuries, whether physical or mental, or (C) to promote 20    medical, surgical, and scientific research and knowledge 21    as permitted under this Act; and (ii) medical research and 22    high technology parks, together with the necessary lands, 23    buildings, facilities, equipment, and personal property 24    for those parks; and25        (3) convene dialogue among leaders in the public and 26    the private sectors on topics and issues associated with   SB2114- 75 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    training in the delivery of health care services in the 2    District's program area. 3    (b) The Commission has perpetual succession and the power 4to contract and be contracted with, to sue and be sued except 5in actions sounding in tort, to plead and be impleaded, to have 6and use a common seal, and to alter the same at pleasure. All 7actions sounding in tort against the Commission shall be 8prosecuted in the Court of Claims. The principal office of the 9Commission shall be in the City of Springfield.10    (c) The Commission shall consist of the following members: 114 members appointed by the Governor, with the advice and 12consent of the Senate; 4 members appointed by the Mayor of 13Springfield, with the advice and consent of the Springfield 14city council; and one member appointed by the Chairperson of 15the County Board of Sangamon County. The initial members of 16the Commission appointed by the Governor shall be appointed 17for terms ending, respectively on the second, third, fourth, 18and fifth anniversaries of their appointments. The initial 19members appointed by the Mayor of Springfield shall be 20appointed 2 each for terms ending, respectively, on the second 21and third anniversaries of their appointments. The initial 22member appointed by the Chairperson of the County Board of 23Sangamon County shall be appointed for a term ending on the 24fourth anniversary of the appointment. Thereafter, all the 25members shall be appointed to hold office for a term of 5 years 26and until their successors are appointed as provided in this   SB2114- 76 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Act.2    Within 60 days after the effective date of this amendatory 3Act of the 95th General Assembly, the Governor shall appoint 2 4additional members to the Commission. One member shall serve 5for a term of 4 years and one member shall serve for a term of 65 years. Their successors shall be appointed for 5-year terms. 7Those additional members and their successors shall be limited 8to residents of the following counties in Illinois: Cass, 9Christian, Logan, Macoupin, Mason, Menard, Montgomery, Morgan, 10or Scott. 11    (d) Any vacancy in the membership of the Commission 12occurring by reason of the death, resignation, 13disqualification, removal, or inability or refusal to act of 14any of the members of the Commission shall be filled by the 15authority that had appointed the particular member, and for 16the unexpired term of office of that particular member. A 17vacancy caused by the expiration of the period for which the 18member was appointed shall be filled by a new appointment for a 19term of 5 years from the date of the expiration of the prior 205-year term notwithstanding when the appointment is actually 21made. The Commission shall obtain, under the provisions of the 22Personnel Code, such personnel as to the Commission shall deem 23advisable to carry out the purposes of this Act and the work of 24the Commission.25    (e) The Commission shall hold regular meetings annually 26for the election of a President, Vice-President, Secretary,   SB2114- 77 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1and Treasurer, for the adoption of a budget, and for such other 2business as may properly come before it. The Commission shall 3elect as the President a member of the Commission appointed by 4the Mayor of Springfield and as the Vice-President a member of 5the Commission appointed by the Governor. The Commission shall 6establish the duties and responsibilities of its officers by 7rule. The President or any 4 members of the Commission may call 8special meetings of the Commission. Each Commissioner shall 9take an oath of office for the faithful performance of his or 10her duties. The Commission may not transact business at a 11meeting of the Commission unless there is present at the 12meeting a quorum consisting of at least 6 Commissioners. 13Meetings may be held by telephone conference or other 14communications equipment by means of which all persons 15participating in the meeting can communicate with each other.16    (f) The Commission shall submit to the General Assembly, 17not later than March 1 of each odd-numbered year, a detailed 18report covering its operations for the 2 preceding calendar 19years and a statement of its program for the next 2 years.20    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 21shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 22by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act, and 23by filing such additional copies with the State Government 24Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is 25required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library 26Act.  SB2114- 78 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    (g) The Auditor General shall conduct audits of the 2Commission in the same manner as the Auditor General conducts 3audits of State agencies under the Illinois State Auditing 4Act.5    (h) Neither the Commission nor the District have any power 6to tax.7    (i) The Commission is a public body and subject to the Open 8Meetings Act and the Freedom of Information Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-1148, eff. 12-10-18.) 10    Section 80. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 11amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 12    (110 ILCS 947/15)13    Sec. 15. Illinois Student Assistance Commission. 14    (a) There is established the Illinois Student Assistance 15Commission, consisting of 10 persons to be appointed by the 16Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The 17membership of the Commission shall consist of one 18representative of the institutions of higher learning operated 19by the State; one representative of the private institutions 20of higher learning located in the State; one representative of 21the public community colleges located in the State; one 22representative of the public high schools located in the 23State; 5 citizens of the State chosen for their knowledge of 24and interest in higher education, but not employed by,   SB2114- 79 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1professionally affiliated with, or members of the governing 2boards of any institution of higher learning located in the 3State, and one student member selected from nominations 4submitted to the Governor by multi-campus student 5organizations, including but not limited to, the recognized 6advisory committee of students of the Illinois Community 7College Board, the recognized advisory committee of students 8of the Board of Higher Education, and the recognized advisory 9committee of students of the Federation of Independent 10Illinois Colleges and Universities. The Governor shall 11designate one member, other than the student member, as 12chairman. Each member of the Commission, including the student 13member, shall serve without compensation, but shall be 14reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in performing the 15member's duties under this Act. Subject to a requirement that 16Commission members in office on the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of 1995 may serve the full term to which they 18were appointed, the appointment of Commission members to terms 19that commence on or after that effective date shall be made in 20a manner that gives effect at the earliest possible time to the 21change that is required by this amendatory Act in the 22representative composition of the Commission's membership.23    (b) The term of office of each member, other than the 24student member, is 6 years from July 1 of the year of 25appointment, and until the member's successor is appointed and 26qualified. If a member's tenure of office, other than that of   SB2114- 80 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1the student member, is terminated for any reason before the 2member's term has expired, the Governor shall fill the vacancy 3by the appointment of a person who has the same representative 4status as the person whose term has been so terminated, and the 5new appointee shall hold office only for the remainder of that 6term and until a successor is appointed and qualified. The 7term of the student member shall be for 2 years from July 1 of 8each odd-numbered year and until a successor is appointed and 9qualified. If the tenure of the student member is terminated 10for any reason, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner 11as heretofore provided for a regular term of office 12appointment of the student member. The new student appointee 13shall hold office for the remainder of that term and until a 14successor is appointed and qualified. A student appointee's 15status on the Commission may not be considered in determining 16the student appointee's eligibility for programs administered 17by the Commission.18    (c) In accordance with the provisions of the State 19Universities Civil Service Act, the Commission shall employ a 20professionally qualified person as the Executive Director of 21the Commission, and such other employees as may be necessary 22to effectuate the purposes of this Act.23    (d) The Commission shall meet at least once in each fiscal 24year, and may meet at other times which the Chairman may 25designate by giving at least 10 days' written notice to each 26member.  SB2114- 81 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1(Source: P.A. 102-23, eff. 6-25-21.) 2    Section 85. The Medical Practice Act of 1987 is amended by 3changing Section 7.1 as follows: 4    (225 ILCS 60/7.1)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)6    Sec. 7.1. Medical Board.7    (A) There is hereby created the Illinois State Medical 8Board. The Medical Board shall consist of 17 members, to be 9appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of 10the Senate. All members shall be residents of the State, not 11more than 8 of whom shall be members of the same political 12party. All members shall be voting members. Eight members 13shall be physicians licensed to practice medicine in all of 14its branches in Illinois possessing the degree of doctor of 15medicine. Two members shall be physicians licensed to practice 16medicine in all its branches in Illinois possessing the degree 17of doctor of osteopathy or osteopathic medicine. Two of the 18physician members shall be physicians who collaborate with 19physician assistants. Two members shall be chiropractic 20physicians licensed to practice in Illinois and possessing the 21degree of doctor of chiropractic. Two members shall be 22physician assistants licensed to practice in Illinois. Three 23members shall be members of the public, who shall not be 24engaged in any way, directly or indirectly, as providers of   SB2114- 82 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1health care.2    (B) Members of the Medical Board shall be appointed for 3terms of 4 years. Upon the expiration of the term of any 4member, their successor shall be appointed for a term of 4 5years by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the 6Senate. The Governor shall fill any vacancy for the remainder 7of the unexpired term with the advice and consent of the 8Senate. Upon recommendation of the Medical Board, any member 9of the Medical Board may be removed by the Governor for 10misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty, after 11notice, and a public hearing, unless such notice and hearing 12shall be expressly waived in writing. Each member shall serve 13on the Medical Board until their successor is appointed and 14qualified. No member of the Medical Board shall serve more 15than 2 consecutive 4-year terms.16    In making appointments the Governor shall attempt to 17ensure that the various social and geographic regions of the 18State of Illinois are properly represented.19    In making the designation of persons to act for the 20several professions represented on the Medical Board, the 21Governor shall give due consideration to recommendations by 22members of the respective professions and by organizations 23therein.24    (C) The Medical Board shall annually elect one of its 25voting members as chairperson and one as vice chairperson. No 26officer shall be elected more than twice in succession to the   SB2114- 83 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1same office. Each officer shall serve until their successor 2has been elected and qualified.3    (D) A majority of the Medical Board members currently 4appointed shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the 5membership of the Medical Board shall not impair the right of a 6quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of 7the Medical Board. Any action taken by the Medical Board under 8this Act may be authorized by resolution at any regular or 9special meeting and each such resolution shall take effect 10immediately. The Medical Board shall meet at least quarterly.11    (E) Each member shall be paid their necessary expenses 12while engaged in the performance of their duties.13    (F) The Secretary shall select a Chief Medical Coordinator 14and not less than 2 Deputy Medical Coordinators who shall not 15be members of the Medical Board. Each medical coordinator 16shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of 17its branches, and the Secretary shall set their rates of 18compensation. The Secretary shall assign at least one medical 19coordinator to a region composed of Cook County and such other 20counties as the Secretary may deem appropriate, and such 21medical coordinator or coordinators shall locate their office 22in Chicago. The Secretary shall assign at least one medical 23coordinator to a region composed of the balance of counties in 24the State, and such medical coordinator or coordinators shall 25locate their office in Springfield. The Chief Medical 26Coordinator shall be the chief enforcement officer of this   SB2114- 84 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Act. None of the functions, powers, or duties of the 2Department with respect to policies regarding enforcement or 3discipline under this Act, including the adoption of such 4rules as may be necessary for the administration of this Act, 5shall be exercised by the Department except upon review of the 6Medical Board.7    (G) The Secretary shall employ, in conformity with the 8Personnel Code, investigators who are college graduates with 9at least 2 years of investigative experience or one year of 10advanced medical education. Upon the written request of the 11Medical Board, the Secretary shall employ, in conformity with 12the Personnel Code, such other professional, technical, 13investigative, and clerical help, either on a full or 14part-time basis as the Medical Board deems necessary for the 15proper performance of its duties.16    (H) Upon the specific request of the Medical Board, signed 17by either the chairperson, vice chairperson, or a medical 18coordinator of the Medical Board, the Department of Human 19Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 20the Department of State Police, or any other law enforcement 21agency located in this State shall make available any and all 22information that they have in their possession regarding a 23particular case then under investigation by the Medical Board.24    (I) Members of the Medical Board shall be immune from suit 25in any action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 26acts performed in good faith as members of the Medical Board.  SB2114- 85 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    (J) The Medical Board may compile and establish a 2statewide roster of physicians and other medical 3professionals, including the several medical specialties, of 4such physicians and medical professionals, who have agreed to 5serve from time to time as advisors to the medical 6coordinators. Such advisors shall assist the medical 7coordinators or the Medical Board in their investigations and 8participation in complaints against physicians. Such advisors 9shall serve under contract and shall be reimbursed at a 10reasonable rate for the services provided, plus reasonable 11expenses incurred. While serving in this capacity, the 12advisor, for any act undertaken in good faith and in the 13conduct of his or her duties under this Section, shall be 14immune from civil suit.15(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 16    Section 90. The Illinois Affordable Housing Act is amended 17by changing Section 6 as follows: 18    (310 ILCS 65/6)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 1256)19    Sec. 6. Advisory Commission. 20    (a) There is hereby created the Illinois Affordable 21Housing Advisory Commission. The Commission shall consist of 2215 members. Three of the Commissioners shall be the Directors 23of the Illinois Housing Development Authority, the Illinois 24Finance Authority and the Department of Commerce and Economic   SB2114- 86 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Opportunity or their representatives. One of the Commissioners 2shall be the Commissioner of the Chicago Department of Housing 3or its representative. The remaining 11 members shall be 4appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the 5Senate, and not more than 4 of these Commission members shall 6reside in any one county in the State. At least one Commission 7member shall be an administrator of a public housing authority 8from other than a municipality having a population in excess 9of 2,000,000; at least 2 Commission members shall be 10representatives of special needs populations as described in 11subsection (e) of Section 8; at least 4 Commission members 12shall be representatives of community-based organizations 13engaged in the development or operation of housing for 14low-income and very low-income households; and at least 4 15Commission members shall be representatives of advocacy 16organizations, one of which shall represent a tenants' 17advocacy organization. The Governor shall consider nominations 18made by advocacy organizations and community-based 19organizations.20    (b) Members appointed to the Commission shall serve a term 21of 3 years; however, 3 members first appointed under this Act 22shall serve an initial term of one year, and 4 members first 23appointed under this Act shall serve a term of 2 years. 24Individual terms of office shall be chosen by lot at the 25initial meeting of the Commission. The Governor shall appoint 26the Chairman of the Commission, and the Commission members   SB2114- 87 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1shall elect a Vice Chairman.2    (c) Members of the Commission shall not be entitled to 3compensation, but shall receive reimbursement for actual and 4reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their 5duties.6    (d) Eight members of the Commission shall constitute a 7quorum for the transaction of business.8    (e) The Commission shall meet at least quarterly and its 9duties and responsibilities are: 10        (1) the study and review of the availability of 11    affordable housing for low-income and very low-income 12    households in the State of Illinois and the development of 13    a plan which addresses the need for additional affordable 14    housing; 15        (2) encouraging collaboration between federal and 16    State agencies, local government and the private sector in 17    the planning, development and operation of affordable 18    housing for low-income and very low-income households; 19        (3) studying, evaluating and soliciting new and 20    expanded sources of funding for affordable housing; 21        (4) developing, proposing, reviewing, and commenting 22    on priorities, policies and procedures for uses and 23    expenditures of Trust Fund monies, including policies 24    which assure equitable distribution of funds statewide; 25        (5) making recommendations to the Program 26    Administrator concerning proposed expenditures from the   SB2114- 88 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    Trust Fund; 2        (6) making recommendations to the Program 3    Administrator concerning the developments proposed to be 4    financed with the proceeds of Affordable Housing Program 5    Trust Fund Bonds or Notes; 6        (7) reviewing and commenting on the development of 7    priorities, policies and procedures for the administration 8    of the Program; 9        (8) monitoring and evaluating all allocations of funds 10    under this Program; and 11        (9) making recommendations to the General Assembly for 12    further legislation that may be necessary in the area of 13    affordable housing.14(Source: P.A. 93-205, eff. 1-1-04; 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 15    Section 95. The Illinois Torture Inquiry and Relief 16Commission Act is amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 17    (775 ILCS 40/20)18    Sec. 20. Membership; chair; meetings; quorum. 19    (a) The Commission shall consist of 8 voting members as 20follows:21        (1) One shall be a retired Circuit Court Judge. 22        (2) One shall be a former prosecuting attorney.23        (3) One shall be a law school professor.24        (4) One shall be engaged in the practice of criminal   SB2114- 89 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    defense law.2        (5) Three shall be members of the public who are not 3    attorneys and who are not officers or employees of the 4    Judicial branch.5        (6) One shall be a former public defender.6    The members of the Commission shall be appointed by the 7Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate. Members 8may be re-appointed for additional terms, as provided for 9under Section 25.10    (a-1) The Governor shall also appoint alternate Commission 11members for the Commission members he or she has appointed to 12serve in the event of scheduling conflicts, conflicts of 13interest, disability, or other disqualification arising in a 14particular case. Where an alternate member is called upon to 15serve in a particular place, the alternate member shall vote 16in the place of, and otherwise exercise the same powers as, the 17member which he or she is replacing. The alternate member 18shall have the same qualifications for appointment as the 19original member. In making the appointments, the Governor 20shall make a good faith effort to appoint members with 21different perspectives of the justice system. The Governor 22shall also consider geographical location, gender, and racial 23diversity in making the appointments. 24    (b) The retired judge who is appointed as a member under 25subsection (a) shall serve as Chair of the Commission. The 26Commission shall have its initial meeting no later than one   SB2114- 90 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1month after the appointment of a quorum of members of the 2Commission, at the call of the Chair. The Commission shall 3meet a minimum of once every 6 months and may also meet more 4often at the call of the Chair. The Commission shall meet at 5such time and place as designated by the Chair, in accordance 6with the provisions of the Open Meetings Act. Notice of the 7meetings shall be given at such time and manner as provided by 8the rules of the Commission, in accordance with the provisions 9of the Open Meetings Act. A majority of the voting members 10shall constitute a quorum. All Commission votes shall be by 11majority vote of the voting members appointed. 12(Source: P.A. 96-223, eff. 8-10-09.) 13    Section 100. The Illinois Clean Energy Jobs and Justice 14Fund Act is amended by changing Section 20-20 as follows: 15    (805 ILCS 155/20-20)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)17    Sec. 20-20. Board of Directors. 18    (a) The Fund shall be managed by, and its powers, 19functions, and duties shall be exercised through, a Board to 20be composed of 11 members. The initial members of the Board 21shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent 22of the Senate within 60 days after the effective date of this 23Act. Members of the Board shall be broadly representative of 24the communities that the Fund is designed to serve. Of such   SB2114- 91 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1members:2        (1) at least one member shall be selected from each of 3    the following geographic regions in the State: northeast, 4    northwest, central, and southern;5        (2) at least 2 members shall have experience in 6    providing energy-related services to low-income, 7    environmental justice, or BIPOC communities;8        (3) at least one member shall own or be employed by an 9    MBE or BIPOC-owned business focused on the deployment of 10    clean energy; 11        (4) at least one member shall be a policy or 12    implementation expert in serving low-income, environmental 13    justice or BIPOC communities or individuals, including 14    environmental justice communities, BIPOC communities, 15    formerly convicted persons, persons who are or were in the 16    child welfare system, displaced energy workers, gender 17    nonconforming and transgender individuals, or youth; and18        (5) at least one member shall be from a 19    community-based organization with a specific mission to 20    support racially and socioeconomically diverse 21    environmental justice communities.22    (a-5) The terms of the initial members of the Board shall 23be as follows:24        (1) 5 members appointed and confirmed shall have 25    initial 5-year terms;26        (2) 3 members appointed and confirmed shall have   SB2114- 92 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    initial 4-year terms; and2        (3) 3 members appointed and confirmed shall have 3    initial 3-year terms.4    (b) Subsequent composition and terms.5        (1) Except for the selection of the initial members of 6    the Board for their initial terms under paragraph (1) of 7    subsection (a) of this Section, the members of the Board 8    shall be elected by the members of the Board.9        (2) A member of the Board shall be disqualified from 10    voting for any position on the Board for which such member 11    is a candidate.12        (3) All members elected pursuant to paragraph (2) of 13    subsection (a) of this Section shall have a term of 5 14    years.15    (c) The members of the Board shall be broadly 16representative of the communities that the Fund is designed to 17serve and shall collectively have expertise in environmental 18justice, energy efficiency, distributed renewable energy, 19workforce development, finance and investments, clean 20transportation, and climate resilience. Of such members:21        (1) not fewer than 2 shall be selected from each of the 22    following geographic regions in the State: northeast, 23    northwest, central, and southern;24        (2) not fewer than 2 shall be from an MBE or 25    BIPOC-owned business focused on the deployment of clean 26    energy;  SB2114- 93 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (3) not fewer than 2 shall be from a community-based 2    organization with a specific mission to support racially 3    and socioeconomically diverse environmental justice 4    communities; and5        (4) not fewer than 2 shall be from an organization 6    specializing in providing energy-related services to 7    low-income, environmental justice, or BIPOC communities.8        (5) Members of the Board can fulfill multiple 9    criteria, such as representing the southern region and an 10    MBE or BIPOC-owned business focused on the deployment of 11    clean energy.12    (d) No officer or employee of the State or any other level 13of government may be appointed or elected as a member of the 14Board.15    (e) Seven members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.16    (f) The Board shall adopt, and may amend, such bylaws as 17are necessary for the proper management and functioning of the 18Fund. Such bylaws shall include designation of officers of the 19Fund and the duties of such officers.20    (g) No person who is an employee in any managerial or 21supervisory capacity, director, officer or agent or who is a 22member of the immediate family of any such employee, director, 23officer, or agent of any public utility is eligible to be a 24director. No director may hold any elective position, be a 25candidate for any elective position, be a State public 26official, be employed by the Illinois Commerce Commission, or   SB2114- 94 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1be employed in a governmental position exempt from the 2Illinois Personnel Code.3    (h) No director, nor member of his or her immediate family 4shall, either directly or indirectly, be employed for 5compensation as a staff member or consultant of the Fund.6    (i) The Board shall hold regular meetings at least once 7every 3 months on such dates and at such places as it may 8determine. Meetings may be held by teleconference or 9videoconference. Special meetings may be called by the 10president or by a majority of the directors upon at least 7 11days' advance written notice. The act of the majority of the 12directors, present at a meeting at which a quorum is present, 13shall be the act of the Board of Directors unless the act of a 14greater number is required by this Act or bylaws. A summary of 15the minutes of every Board meeting shall be made available to 16each public library in the State upon request and to 17individuals upon request. Board of Directors meeting minutes 18shall be posted on the Fund's website within 14 days after 19Board approval of the minutes.20    (j) A director may not receive any compensation for his or 21her services but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses, 22including travel expenses incurred in the discharge of duties. 23The Board shall establish standard allowances for mileage, 24room and meals and the purposes for which such allowances may 25be made and shall determine the reasonableness and necessity 26for such reimbursements.  SB2114- 95 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1    (k) In the event of a vacancy on the Board, the Board of 2Directors shall appoint a temporary member, consistent with 3the requirements of the Board composition, to serve the 4remainder of the term for the vacant seat.5    (l) The Board shall adopt rules for its own management and 6government, including bylaws and a conflict of interest 7policy.8    (m) The Board of Directors of the Fund shall adopt written 9procedures for:10        (1) adopting an annual budget and plan of operations, 11    including a requirement of Board approval before the 12    budget or plan may take effect;13        (2) hiring, dismissing, promoting, and compensating 14    employees of the Fund, including an affirmative action 15    policy and a requirement of Board approval before a 16    position may be created or a vacancy filled;17        (3) acquiring real and personal property and personal 18    services, including a requirement of Board approval for 19    any non-budgeted expenditure in excess of $5,000;20        (4) contracting for financial, legal, bond 21    underwriting and other professional services, including 22    requirements that the Fund (i) solicit proposals at least 23    once every 3 years for each such service that it uses, and 24    (ii) ensure equitable contracting with diverse suppliers;25        (5) issuing and retiring bonds, bond anticipation 26    notes, and other obligations of the Fund; and  SB2114- 96 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1        (6) awarding loans, grants and other financial 2    assistance, including (i) eligibility criteria, the 3    application process and the role played by the Fund's 4    staff and Board of Directors, and (ii) ensuring racial 5    equity in the awarding of loans, grants, and other 6    financial assistance.7    (n) The Board shall develop a robust set of metrics to 8measure the degree to which the program is meeting the 9purposes set forth in Section 20-5 of this Act, and especially 10measuring adherence to the racial equity purposes set forth 11there, and a reporting format and schedule to be adhered to by 12the Fund officers and staff. These metrics and reports shall 13be posted quarterly on the Fund's website.14    (o) The Board of Directors has the responsibility to make 15program adjustments necessary to ensure that the Clean Energy 16Jobs and Justice Fund is meeting the purposes set forth in this 17Act. Fund officers and staff and the Board of Directors are 18responsible for ensuring capital providers and Fund officers 19and staff, partners, and financial institutions are held to 20state and federal standards for ethics and predatory lending 21practices and shall immediately remove any offending products 22and sponsoring organizations from Fund participation.23    (p) The Board shall issue annually a report reviewing the 24activities of the Fund in detail and shall provide a copy of 25such report to the joint standing committees of the General 26Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to energy and   SB2114- 97 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1commerce. The report shall be published on the Fund's website 2within 3 days after its submission to the General Assembly. 3(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 4    Section 105. The Illinois Secure Choice Savings Program 5Act is amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 80/20)7    Sec. 20. Composition of the Board. There is created the 8Illinois Secure Choice Savings Board. 9    (a) The Board shall consist of the following 7 members:10        (1) the State Treasurer, or his or her designee, who 11    shall serve as chair; 12        (2) the State Comptroller, or his or her designee; 13        (3) the Director of the Governor's Office of 14    Management and Budget, or his or her designee; 15        (4) two public representatives with expertise in 16    retirement savings plan administration or investment, or 17    both, appointed by the Governor; 18        (5) a representative of participating employers, 19    appointed by the Governor; and 20        (6) a representative of enrollees, appointed by the 21    Governor. 22    (b) Members of the Board shall serve without compensation 23but may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses incurred 24in connection with their Board duties from funds appropriated   SB2114- 98 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1for the purpose.2    (c) The initial appointments for the Governor's appointees 3shall be as follows: one public representative for 4 years; 4one public representative for 2 years; the representative of 5participating employers for 3 years; and the representative of 6enrollees for 1 year. Thereafter, all of the Governor's 7appointees shall be for terms of 4 years.8    (d) A vacancy in the term of an appointed Board member 9shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the 10same manner as the original appointment.11    (e) Each appointment by the Governor shall be subject to 12approval by the State Treasurer, who, upon approval, shall 13certify his or her approval to the Secretary of State. Each 14appointment by the Governor shall also be subject to the 15advice and consent of the Senate. In case of a vacancy during a 16recess of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint a replacement 17member make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of 18the Senate, at which time the Governor shall appoint some 19person to fill the office. If the State Treasurer does not 20approve or disapprove the appointment by the Governor within 2160 session days after receipt thereof, the person shall be 22deemed to have been approved by the State Treasurer. Any 23appointment that has not been acted upon by the Senate within 2460 session days after the receipt thereof shall be deemed to 25have received the advice and consent of the Senate.26    (f) Each Board member, prior to assuming office, shall   SB2114- 99 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1take an oath that he or she will diligently and honestly 2administer the affairs of the Board and that he or she will not 3knowingly violate or willingly permit to be violated any of 4the provisions of law applicable to the Program. The oath 5shall be certified by the officer before whom it is taken and 6immediately filed in the office of the Secretary of State. 7(Source: P.A. 98-1150, eff. 6-1-15.) 8    Section 110. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 9changing Sections 8.3 and 13.1 as follows: 10    (820 ILCS 305/8.3)11    Sec. 8.3. Workers' Compensation Medical Fee Advisory 12Board. There is created a Workers' Compensation Medical Fee 13Advisory Board consisting of 9 members appointed by the 14Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. Three 15members of the Advisory Board shall be representatives of a 16labor organization recognized under the National Labor 17Relations Act or an attorney who has represented labor 18organizations or has represented employees in workers' 19compensation cases, 3 members shall be representative citizens 20chosen from the employing class, and 3 members shall be 21representative citizens chosen from the medical provider 22class. Each member shall serve a 4-year term and shall 23continue to serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy on 24the Advisory Board shall be filled by the Governor for the   SB2114- 100 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1unexpired term.2    Members of the Advisory Board shall receive no 3compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for 4expenses incurred in the performance of their duties by the 5Commission from appropriations made to the Commission for that 6purpose.7    The Advisory Board shall advise the Commission on 8establishment of fees for medical services and accessibility 9of medical treatment.10(Source: P.A. 101-384, eff. 1-1-20.) 11    (820 ILCS 305/13.1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.13-1)12    Sec. 13.1. (a) There is created a Workers' Compensation 13Advisory Board hereinafter referred to as the Advisory Board. 14After the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th 15General Assembly, the Advisory Board shall consist of 12 16members appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent 17of the Senate. Six members of the Advisory Board shall be 18representative citizens chosen from a labor organization 19recognized under the National Labor Relations Act or an 20attorney who has represented labor organizations or has 21represented employees in workers' compensation cases, and 6 22members shall be representative citizens chosen from the 23employing class. The Chairman of the Commission shall serve as 24the ex officio Chairman of the Advisory Board. After the 25effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General   SB2114- 101 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1Assembly, each member of the Advisory Board shall serve a term 2ending on the third Monday in January 2007 and shall continue 3to serve until his or her successor is appointed and 4qualified. Members of the Advisory Board shall thereafter be 5appointed for 4 year terms from the third Monday in January of 6the year of their appointment, and until their successors are 7appointed and qualified. Seven members of the Advisory Board 8shall constitute a quorum to do business, but in no case shall 9there be less than one representative from each class. A 10vacancy on the Advisory Board shall be filled by the Governor 11for the unexpired term.12    (b) Members of the Advisory Board shall receive no 13compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for 14expenses incurred in the performance of their duties by the 15Commission from appropriations made to the Commission for such 16purpose.17    (c) The Advisory Board shall aid the Commission in 18formulating policies, discussing problems, setting priorities 19of expenditures, reviewing advisory rates filed by an advisory 20organization as defined in Section 463 of the Illinois 21Insurance Code, and establishing short and long range 22administrative goals. Prior to making the (1) initial set of 23arbitrator appointments pursuant to this amendatory Act of the 2497th General Assembly and (2) appointment of Commissioners, 25the Governor shall request that the Advisory Board make 26recommendations as to candidates to consider for appointment   SB2114- 102 -LRB104 08882 SPS 18937 b1and the Advisory Board may then make such recommendations. 2    (d) The terms of all Advisory Board members serving on the 3effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 4Assembly are terminated. The Governor shall appoint new 5members to the Advisory Board within 30 days after the 6effective date of the amendatory Act of the 97th General 7Assembly, subject to the advice and consent of the Senate. 8(Source: P.A. 101-384, eff. 1-1-20.)